 Currently, we have mice that were previously diabetic and are now no longer diabetic.
 The research is still in its early stages, as Dr Ehud Ur, a lecturer in the faculty of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the clinical and scientific Department of the Canadian diabetes Association,
 Like other specialists, he is skeptical about whether diabetes can be cured and points out that these discoveries are not relevant to those who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy,
 Danius declared, I have called and sent Emails to his closest aide, and I have received very cordial replies.
 Before this, Ring's Ceo, Jamie Siminoff, had mentioned that the company had started after the doorbell at his garage wouldn't ring.
 He said he built a Wifi transmitter.
 Siminoff declared that sales soared after his appearance on an episode of Shark Tank in the year 2013, in which the panel of the television program refused to fund the company.
 Towards the end of the year 2017, Siminoff made an appearance on the television shopping channel, QVC.
 Ring also came to an agreement in the lawsuit with the competing security company, ADT Corporation.
 To date, no drug has been proven to be adequate to treat the existing infection caused by Ebola, although there is an experimental vaccine that appears to be able to decrease the mortality caused by that disease.
 Zmapp, a combination of antibodies, had a promising early field result, but formal studies showed it was less beneficial than expected to prevent death.
 In the PALM trial, the Zmapp function was a control,
 USA Gymnastics supports the U S . Olympic Committee's statement and recognizes that it is imperative that the U S . Olympic family foster a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the statement of the USOC that the interests of the athletes, the clubs and their sports can be better served by moving forward with meaningful changes within our organization, rather than by withdrawing our certifications.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that can shed light on how the abuse of the proportion that the survivors of Larry Nassa described with so much courage could have gone on for so long and accept any changes that are necessary and appropriate.
 The goal of USA Gymnastics and the U S . Olympic Committee is the same: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for athletes to pursue their dreams in a protected, positive and enhanced environment.
 During the sixty s, Brzezinski worked for John F . Kennedy as an advisor and, later, for the government of Lyndon B . Johnson.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy in the 1976 elections, and then worked as a national security advisor to Henry Kissinger from 1977 to 1981.
 As national security advisor, he assisted Carter in the diplomatic handling of international affairs, such as the 1978 Camp David accords, the normalization of relations between the United States and China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution of 1979,
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma stone, was nominated in all the most important categories.
 Gosling and stone were nominated for best actor and best actress, respectively.
 Among the other nominations are best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best editing, best original score, best production design, best editing, best sound mixing and best original screenplay.
 There were two songs nominated for best original song, Audition and city of stars.
 On Sunday night, in a statement made through the press Secretary, the President of the United States, Donald Trump,
 The announcement came after a phone call that Trump had with the President of Turkey, Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also assume the custody of the ISIS fighters who were captured, and who the European nations, as the statement indicates, have denied repatriation to.
 In addition to confirming that at least some dinosaurs were feathered, a theory already generalized, it also offers specific data that fossils generally do not, such as their color and three-dimensional structure.
 According to specialists, this animal has a plumage of a reddish color on the upper part and a pale or carotenoid tint on the lower part.
 It also allows us to better understand the evolution of bird feathers.
 Since the feathers of dinosaurs do not have a well-developed rachis, but do have other feather characteristics,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that their function was not related to flight, but rather to regulate or indicate the temperature,
 The experts said that, although it is the tail of a dinosaur of short age,
 In the morning of yesterday, in Gaziantep, Turkey, a car bomb killed two police officers and injured more than twenty other people.
 The government said that nineteen of the injured were police officers.
 The police said the suspect in the attack is a suspected Daish militant.
 It was found that the sun was governed by the same basic principles as other stars the only factors that drove its activity within the system were its luminosity and its rotation.
 The intensity of the light and the rotation are combined to calculate a star's Rossby number, which is linked to the plasma's flow.
 The fewer the number of Rossby, the less is the star's activity in relation to its magnetic inversions.
 Iwasaki faced numerous problems during his voyage.
 He was robbed by pirates, bitten by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped from a marriage in Nepal, and was stopped by the police in India.
 The 802.11n standard works in both the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz frequencies.
 This will make it possible for it to be compatible with earlier versions of 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g,
 The speeds of 802.11n are much higher than those of the previous standards, with a theoretical maximum of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married and has two adult children, did not make a good impression on Miller, who was the one who told him the story.
 When asked for a comment, Miller said, quote, I was preparing, so I really couldn't hear what he was saying.
 We will work hard to reduce the level of carbon dioxide emitted per unit of GDP by 2020, so that the difference will be significant compared with 2005,
 He did not mention a figure for the cuts and said they would be based on China's economic output.
 Hu encouraged developing countries to not return to the traditional path of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 And he said, quote, even if you do not have the ability to do so,
 The Iraq Study Group released its report at noon today.
 No one can give any assurances that any Iraqi action at this point will stop sectarian fighting,
 The report begins with a call for open debate and a consensus in the United States about policies on the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of virtually every aspect of the current policy of the executive branch in Iraq, and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 It contains 78 recommendations, of which recommendation number one is the adoption of a new initiative before the end of the year with the purpose of protecting the borders of Iraq from hostile operations and to restore diplomatic ties with its neighbors.
 Cristina Kirchner, who is now a senator and is the first lady of Argentina, announced last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires, that she will run for the Presidency.
 The Teatro Argentino was the place where Mrs . Kirchner announced her intention to run for President,
 The issue that sparked the debate was the controversy over the budget allocated for the relief and reconstruction of New Orleans after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives labeled the New Orleans bailout.
 The criticisms of the liberals in relation to the works of restoration have their focus on the fact that they have awarded reconstruction contracts to people who, apparently, are functionaries of Washington.
 More than four million people gathered in Rome to witness the funeral.
 The funeral was so crowded that not everyone could get into the square,
 There were large television screens set up in different parts of Rome so that everyone could see the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities, as well as all over the world, in particular in Poland, similar setups were carried out, and saw many, many people.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies for concentrating its resources on easy-to-solve cases, especially those of stolen automobiles,
 In the fiscal year 2005, Congress began funding the campaign against obscenity and instructed the FBI to assign 10 agents to deal with pornography for adults.
 Robin Uthappa scored the most runs in the innings, with 70 runs, including 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The performance of both Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, was good and they scored a century partnership.
 But after losing the captain's wicket, India could only score 36 runs and 7 of their wickets were bowled out to end the innings.
 The U S . President, George W . Bush, arrived in Singapore early on November sixteen, beginning a seven-day tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's deputy Prime Minister, Wong Kan Seng, and discussed trade and terrorism with the head of state, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of Midterm election defeats, Bush gave a speech to the audience about the expansion of trade in the Asian continent.
 Stephen Harper, the prime minister, agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee where all parties are represented before the second reading, and after the 25-minute meeting at the PMO on Tuesday with Jack Layton, the leader of the NDP.
 During the meeting with the prime minister, Layton had asked for changes to the conservatives' environmental law, calling for a, quote, exhaustive and complete revision of its wording.
 Since the Federal Government intervened and took over the financing of the Mersey hospital in Davenport, Tasmania, state and some Federal politicians have called the move a stunt,
 However, the prime minister, John Howard, stated that the only purpose of the law was to protect the hospital from degradation by the Tasmanian government,
 As the latest report indicates, sea level readings have indicated the formation of a tsunami, and there has been some tsunami activity detected near Pago Pago and Niue.
 No further damage or injuries were reported in Tonga, but the power supply was temporarily disrupted, which is supposed to have frustrated the Tongan authorities' receipt of the tsunami warning issued by the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in and around the area of Hawaii closed completely on Wednesday, despite the warnings being lifted.
 George W . Bush, president of the United States, was pleased to hear the announcement.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for Bush, called the North Korean pledge an important step towards the goal of achieving a verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 Today, the tenth named storm of its hurricane season,
 The National Hurricane center said that it's still expected that Jerry will make landfall.
 According to estimates by the United States Army Corps of engineers, up to six inches of rain could seep through the previously damaged levees.
 Due to the overflow of the dam that is near the Ninth Ward, the water is now up to the waist in that area, which had already suffered flooding of up to 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina.
 The water flows over the dike in a stretch that is 100 feet wide.
 In an interview, he said the new variant was a very highly troubling and alarming one because of the very high fatality rate.
 In essence, he lied to us from the beginning, on the one hand, pretending that he did so for legal reasons,
 The outcry from the community led to the current efforts to draft a policy on the site's sexual content, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 Although it was an eminently theoretical work, the program was drafted with the purpose of simulating the observations made at the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The forces of gravity between the dark matter in the Galaxy and the matter in the Milky way would be the forces of gravity between the dark matter in the Galaxy and the matter in the Milky way.
 The Milky way influences the Sagittarius Galaxy in the same way that the moon exerts a pull on our planet and causes the tides.
 The experts concluded that the dark matter is affected by the regular matter just as the regular matter is affected by the regular matter.
 This theory holds that most of the dark matter surrounding a Galaxy is in a kind of halo, and consists of numerous small particles.
 You can see white smoke coming out of the plant in the television coverage.
 The local government warns residents near the plant not to leave their homes, keep air conditioners off, and not to consume water from the tap.
 According to Japan's nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been found in the plant.
 According to the authorities, all indications are that the containers at the site that have uranium fuel could have ruptured and have leaks.
 The extremely drug resistant tuberculosis, or XDR-TB, was first detected by Dr . Tony Moll in a South African area of Zululandia.
 During an interview, he said the new variant was causing a lot of concern and alarm, given its high death rate.
 The doctor, Moll, thinks some patients may have contracted the virus inside the hospital and that at least two of the infected were health care workers at that hospital.
 In one year, a single infected person can infect between 10 and 15 people with whom he or she has had close contact.
 But the percentage of XDR-TB in the total group of TB patients still seems to be low, at 6000 out of a total of 333 000 individuals infected at a particular time in South Africa.
 The satellites, which weighed over 1,000 pounds and traveled at about 17,500 miles per hour,
 According to experts, the explosion that resulted from the collision was massive.
 And we're still trying to figure out how important it was and how it will affect the planet.
 The U S . strategic command, which is part of the Department of Defense,
 The results of the tracing will be made available on a free access Website.
 The authorities in Ohio reported that a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania,
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, age 29, was found in blue ash, Ohio, a suburb located about fifteen miles north of Cincinnati,
 He led the officers to his black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was located 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered with blood-stained blankets.
 The police said the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease during this season were recorded towards the end of July.
 Pigs are the carriers of the disease, which then migrates to humans via mosquitoes.
 The outbreak has led to the Indian authorities taking measures such as the deployment of pig hunters, the distribution of thousands of mosquito nets to the population,
 The authorities have also guaranteed several million vials of the vaccine to fight encephalitis, which will allow sanitary companies to prepare for next year.
 This year, the shortage of money and the low priority, compared to other diseases, have caused delays in the execution of the vaccine delivery plans in the historically most vulnerable regions.
 In 1956, Słonia moved to Sweden, where, after three years, he got a job at the Swedish postal office and there he became the chief engraver.
 The amount of stamps he has made, both for Sweden and for 28 other nations,
 The quality and level of detail of his work is so recognized that he has become one of the few, if not the only,
 Included in the Guinness book of world records, his one thousandth stamp was the formidable,
 He also had a hand in the design of the new five and one hundred dollar Canadian bank notes,
 After the accident, they took Gibson to a hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The 64 year old driver of the truck escaped unharmed.
 They removed the vehicle from the scene around noon GMT the same day.
 An employee of a garage near the scene of the accident said,
 All of them ran back to the scene of the accident.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali are saving the forests that remain on the planet and sharing technologies to help developing nations grow in a less contaminating way.
 The UN intends to complete a fund for assisting countries that are victims of the effects of global warming, in order to be able to cope with its impact.
 Money could be allocated to Non-Flood-Prone homes, better water management, and crop diversification.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some to silence women who speak out about the health of these women did not succeed.
 He concluded this based on the large number of positive and encouraging comments from women and men urging that contraceptive medicines be considered as a health need.
 Once the fighting had ceased, after the wounded had been taken to the hospital, about forty of the remaining prisoners remained in the yard, resisting going to their cells.
 Although the negotiators tried to compose the situation, the demands of the prisoners are confusing.
 The inmates set fire to the prison yard between 10:00 and 11:00 p.m.
 The police quickly entered the yard and dispersed the inmates with tear gas.
 The firefighters were able to put out the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 With the construction of the dam in 1963, the seasonal flooding that left sediments along the river was stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the formation of sand banks and beaches, which in turn functioned as habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species of fish have been extinguished and two others are in danger of extinction, including the Gila Cypha.
 Although the water level will only rise a few feet past the flood,
 No tsunami alert was issued or will be issued, as the earthquake did not reach the magnitude of 6.5 required for such an alert.
 Even though there was no tsunami threat, residents began to panic and leave their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey cried at her farewell, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 This is not a farewell, it is only the end of one chapter and the beginning of another.
 The comfortable re-election of the incumbent, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was confirmed by the final results of the Namibian parliamentary and presidential elections.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organization, SWAPO,
 The coalition and Afghan forces have moved into the region to secure the place and other coalition aircraft have been sent to assist them.
 The accident took place on a mountainous terrain and is estimated to have been caused by a hostile fire.
 The efforts to find the place of the accident must deal with the bad weather and the rough terrain.
 The charity, Doctors Without Borders, and the World Health Organization,
 The spokesperson for Medecines Sans Frontieres, Richard Veerman, commented,
 The start of the games was at 10:00 a.m., accompanied by a good climate, and, except for a light rain at noon which soon passed,
 South Africa, the top seed in the tournament, started well by winning a comfortable 26-0 against Zambia, who are ranked fifth.
 Although they were shown to be dormant against their sisters from the South, South Africa improved as the tournament progressed.
 Their disciplined defense, their ball handling skills and their excellent teamwork led them to stand out and it was clear that this was the team to defeat.
 The authorities in Amsterdam and the Anne Frank House maintain that a fungus has infected the tree and is a public health hazard because it is at imminent risk of falling.
 His felling was scheduled for Tuesday, but was saved after an emergency court order.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, known as the Seven Sisters, is at least 100 to 250 metres.
 As the infrared images emerge, the temperature variations during the day and night indicate that they are probably caves.
 During the day, its temperature is lower than that of the surrounding surface, and at night, higher.
 Although its thermal behavior is not as regular as the large caves on our planet, which usually maintain a fairly stable temperature,
 In France, elections have traditionally been a low-tech affair: voters seal themselves in a booth and insert a pre-printed slip of paper into a ballot box.
 After the officials have verified the identity of the person who is presenting himself or herself to vote,
 The French electoral law establishes the procedures quite strictly.
 Since 1988, the urns have to be transparent, allowing voters and observers to verify that no ballots are added or subtracted from those of the voters who have voted,
 Candidates are allowed to send representatives to control each stage of the process, and during the night, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision and in accordance with specific procedures.
 ASUS Eee PC, which was previously launched globally for its cost-saving and functionality, became the hot topic of discussion at the Taipei International Information Technology Exhibition 2007.
 But the market for notebook consumers drastically changed after ASUS received the Taiwan Sustainable Development Award 2007 from the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The Website describes the show as a, quote, old-school radio drama with a smart, new, and offensive twist.
 In its early days, the program was only broadcast on the radio station's Website, TogiNet radio, a long-running radio station focused on the spoken word format.
 And in the fall of two thousand and sixteen,
 Originally, the show featured local East Texas voice actors,
 It was reported that widespread looting extended throughout the night, as there was no police presence in the streets of Bishkek.
 An observer described Bishkek as sinking into anarchy as groups of people wandered through the streets and looted shops and stores.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the South for the riot.
 South Africa defeated New Zealand in a Rugby Union match of the three nations, at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was a one point victory, twenty one to twenty, ending the All Blacks' run of fifteen consecutive victories.
 In the case of the Springboks, it meant overcoming a run of five consecutive losses.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final of the series will be played at Ellis Park, Johannesburg, next week, in a clash between the Springboks and Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook the West of Montana at 10:08 p.m. on Monday.
 Neither the U S . Geological survey,
 The earthquake's epicenter was located about 20 km north-northeast of Dillon and about 65 km south of Butte.
 The avian flu virus that has killed people, H5N1, attacked a wild duck that was found dead on Monday in a pond near Lyon, in eastern France.
 France is ranked seventh among the European Union countries in terms of victims of the virus,
 The outbreaks in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed as being caused by the H5N5 virus.
 Chambers's claim against God was based on the death of millions and millions of people on the planet,
 Chambers, an agnostic, argues that his claim has no merit and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story that Armand Versace tells is that of an artist, whose life is prescribed by love, drugs and Japan.
 As a result, artists smoke marijuana cigarettes on stage and the show encourages the audience to do the same.
 The former Speaker of the House, Newt Gingrich, the governor of Texas, Rick Perry, and Michele Bachmann, a member of the House,
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but launched harsh words against Romney, whose campaign ads had been running negative ads against Gingrich in Iowa.
 Perry stated, I will be back in Texas to evaluate the results of today's election and determine if there is a path I should follow.
 Bachmann, who had won the Ames Straw poll in August, decided to end his campaign.
 They took the photographer to Ronald Reagan UCLA medical center,
 According to reports, he was in his twenties, and Bieber said in a statement, quote,
 According to the entertainment news Website TMZ, the photographer stopped the vehicle on the Sepulveda sidewalk and attempted to take photographs of the California patrol officer who was conducting the vehicle stop, which caused the California patrol officer to give the vehicle two times the order to cross the street.
 According to police officials, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will be prosecuted.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, there are several countries that have not yet reached the podium of medals.
 Included are the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen, who yesterday got the ninth place in the women's Super-G, and Finland, with Katja Saarinen in the tenth place in the same event.
 Mitchell Gourley, of Australia, was eleventh in the men's slalom super-giant, and the Czech competitor, Oldrich Jelinek, was sixteenth in the men's slalom super-giant.
 Arly Velásquez, of Mexico, was in fifteenth place in the men's Super-G. Adam Hall, of New Zealand, was in ninth place in the men's Super-G.
 The male skier with visual impairment, Maciej Krezel, and his guide, Anna Ogarzynska, from Poland, finished in the thirteenth place in the Super-G.
 After the earthquake in 2010, the UN peacekeepers arrived in Haiti and were blamed for spreading the disease, as the first cases were registered near the camp of their troops.
 According to the demand, the UN camp did not sanitize the waste properly, which caused the bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of the most caudal of Haiti.
 Prior to the arrival of the peacekeepers, Haiti had not faced any problems associated with the disease since the nineteenth century.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti has mentioned the existence of independent trials that point to the UN peacekeeping Nepalese battalion as the one that unintentionally introduced the disease to Haiti.
 According to Danielle Lantagne, a disease expert who works for the UN, it's likely that the outbreak was caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University hospital had admitted the patient and that his condition was stable.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where there were some cases of Ebola.
 The hospital has followed the infection control protocol, including keeping the patient away from other patients to prevent infections.
 Previously, before the Simpsons, Simon had held several jobs in other television shows, in different positions.
 In the eighty s, he lent his voice to several shows, including taxi, cheers, and the Tracy Ullman show.
 In 1989, he helped with the creation of the Simpsons, along with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing team.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars in royalties season after season.
 The news agency Xinhua had previously reported the hijacking of a plane.
 According to subsequent reports, the aircraft received a bomb threat and was diverted back to Kandahar, where it landed.
 Preliminary reports indicate that the aircraft was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was denied authorization to make an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air accidents are common in Iran, which has an old and poorly maintained fleet,
 The sanctions imposed at international level have translated into the impossibility of acquiring new aircraft.
 Three people were killed and three others injured in a police helicopter crash earlier this week.
 Last month, Iran experienced one of its worst air disasters in years when a passenger plane headed to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 passengers on board.
 The same month, another passenger plane overran a runway in Mashhad and collided with a wall, leaving seventeen dead.
 Aerosmith canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The band had a tour scheduled for the United States and Canada that would end on September sixteenth.
 The reason for the cancellation was the injury that Steven Tyler suffered when he fell off the stage during one of their performances on August five.
 After both players held all of the service games, Murray lost the first set by a sudden death.
 Although Del Potro had an immediate advantage in the second set, this also was subject to a tiebreaker after reaching the 6-6.
 At that point in the match, Del Potro had to receive treatment on his shoulder, but he was able to return to the game.
 The program began at 8:30 p.m. local time,
 Renowned national singers performed bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The singer Sanju Sharma was the first to perform, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also performed the chhappan bhog bhajan,
 After that, Lakkha Singh went to the front to sing the bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was honored with 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog which, in Hindu religion, consists of 56 different kinds of foods like sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc, which are served as an offering to the god.
 In addition, Lakkha Singh performed the chhappan bhog bhajan along with the singer Raju Khandekwak.
 On Thursday, at the Tokyo Game Show, Satoru Iwata, the President of Nintendo,
 And in a way similar to a remote control of a television, this control is provided with two sensors located near the user's television, allowing the triangulation of its position in a three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in Video games, through the movement of the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella was unable to keep control of the vehicle and abandoned the race shortly after the start.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, had the lead for most of the race, but had to give it up just after his pit stop, probably because his right rear tire was badly damaged.
 Michael Schumacher retired from the race shortly after Alonso, due to a suspension failure caused by the numerous battles during the race.
 According to a transcript of the press conference, he said, quote, she was very pretty and, in addition, she sang quite well.
 Every time we did an experiment like this, it moved me to the very depths of my soul.
 Approximately three minutes after takeoff, a camera inside the ship showed numerous pieces of insulating foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 In any case, it is believed that they have not caused any damage to the shuttle.
 N . Wayne Hale Jr, the head of NASA's shuttle program, stated that the foam had fallen off the shuttle,
 Five minutes after the start of the show, a wind that had reached seventy kilometers per hour,
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on the way back I saw two people in wheelchairs and the others were jumping over them and pushing them.
 In addition, NHK indicated that the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. stated that the earthquake did not cause any incidents and that reactors 1 and 2 of its Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 It is reported that around 9,400 homes in the region are without water and around 100 without electricity.
 Some routes were damaged, train service was disrupted in the affected areas, and the Noto airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb was detonated at the door of the governor's office.
 Three other bombs were detonated in the vicinity of governmental establishments in a two-hour span.
 Although there are reports that the official death toll is eight and the authorities have confirmed that around 30 people were injured, the official death toll is still unknown.
 They found high levels of cyanide and melamine in the urine samples of animals that had died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The researchers indicated that the two compounds react with each other to give rise to crystals that can obstruct the function of the kidneys.
 The specialists detected the formation of crystals in the urine of cats,
 By comparing the composition of the crystals found in the urine of affected pets,
 I do not know whether or not they have noticed it, but most of the products from Central America were coming to this country free of duty.
 Even so, the countries of Central America levied tariffs on eighty percent of the products that we made.
 I thought that was not right, and I thought it was not fair.
 The only thing I say to the people is that you treat us the same way that we treat you.
 A proposed law was dictated by the governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, which does not allow the sale or rental of violent Video-Games to minors.
 The bill would require violent Video games sold in the state of California to be labeled with a sticker that says,
 The director of the Prosecutor's office, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning,
 Huhne has resigned, and Ed Davey MP will replace him in the cabinet, and Norman Lamb MP is expected to take over as business minister.
 On the sixteenth of February is the date on which Huhne and Pryce are scheduled to appear before the Westminster Magistrates' Court.
 Nicholas Alden and Zachary Cuddeback, aged 25 and 21, respectively, died.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds to the arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required facial reconstruction surgery.
 The Uka's weapon jammed as it pointed toward the head of a fifth man, Schneider suffers permanent pain, has one eye, and his skull was reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider testified via a virtual link from a U S . Air Force base in his home country.
 Carpanedo participated in two individual races of the championship apart from the Wednesday competition.
 The first was the slalom, in which he got a no finish in the first run, along with 36 of the 116 skiers in that race.
 In her other event, the slalom, she finished tenth in the women's combined event with a combined time of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 minutes behind the first Austrian finalist, Claudia Loesch, and 1:09.02 minutes behind the ninth finalist, Gyongyi Dani, of Hungary.
 Four skiers in the category sitting did not complete their runs and a total of 45 skiers out of 117 in the slalom Gigante did not make it to the finals.
 The Madhya Pradesh police force was able to recover the stolen laptop and cell phone.
 The assistant inspector general, D.K. Arya, said,
 Baba, Bhutha, Rampro, Gaza, and Vishnu Kanjar are the accused.
 The accused, according to the superintendent of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki,
 Despite the fact that there were three people in the house at the time of the car's impact,
 But the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services removed the driver of the Audi TT red.
 At first, he was taken to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya has been in the Edinburgh sheriff court, accused of the murder of her son.
 Although she is in custody awaiting trial, any statement by an eyewitness can be questionable,
 It is a common practice in other parts of the United Kingdom, but as Scottish justice is run in a different way, the courts considered the publication of photographs to be potentially prejudicial.
 The professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee said,
 The office of the crown, which is in charge of the proceedings, told reporters it would not be making any additional comments at least until the ruling is made.
 According to the information that leaked out, the document will deal with the border conflict, which Palestine intends to resolve based on the pre-war boundaries of the 1967 Middle East war.
 Other topics that were reportedly discussed include the future of Jerusalem, which both nations consider sacred, and the future of the West Bank and the Jordan River.
 Israel demands a military presence in the valley for ten years once the agreement is signed, while the PA only agrees to five.
 During the control pest trial, the wardens had to supervise the shooters closely, as the shooter was being monitored and evaluated for effectiveness.
 A partnership between NPWS and the New South Wales Association of Sporting and Recreational shooters Inc,
 Mick O'Flynn, who is in charge, provisionally, of the conservation and heritage office of the NPWS,
 And the day before, Martelly swore in a new nine-member Provisional Electoral Council.
 In four years, it's the fifth CEP of Martelly.
 Last month, a Presidential Commission advised that the old CEP resign, as part of a series of measures to lead the country towards new elections.
 The Commission was the way in which Martelly responded to the widespread demonstrations that began in October against his regime.
 The demonstrations, in some cases violent, were triggered by the fact that elections have not been held since 2011.
 There have been about sixty cases of iPods with overheating and overheating, which has caused six fires and caused minor burns to four people.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry of Japan, METI,
 Last week, METI announced that apple had told them about 34 additional incidents of overheating, which the company had classified as not serious.
 The Ministry responded to the delay in the report by saying it was a matter of great concern.
 Mariana was shaken by a quake at 7:19 a M local time,
 The agency for emergency management in the Northern Mariana Islands indicated that there were no reports of damage in the territory.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning center also reported no indicators of a tsunami.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former police officer seized a bus and held tourists from Hong Kong as hostages.
 Rolando Mendoza opened fire with his M16 against the foreign visitors.
 Several hostages have been rescued, and so far, at least six have been confirmed dead.
 Both the hostages, including children and the elderly, and the Filipino photographers were released early.
 Later, the photographers took the place of an old woman who needed to go to the bathroom, and Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and began studying medicine.
 She received her training in obstetrics and entered the Auckland women's hospital around 1959.
 Liggins began her research on premature birth in her spare time while working at the hospital.
 His study showed that fetal lung maturation in the baby could be sped up by the administration of a hormone.
 Xinhua reported on Wednesday that government investigators had recovered the flight recorders from the black box.
 Luna's fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to him.
 Luna was the first queen of the extreme,
 Dustin Runnels stated, quote, Luna was as rare as me, even more so.
 Since two thousand and eight, among the one thousand four hundred and sixty people polled in the lead up to the two thousand and ten Federal elections,
 Julia Gillard, the acting Prime Minister, stated during the 2010 Federal election campaign that she considered Australia should become a Republic once the reign of Queen Elizabeth II had ended.
 Thirty four percent of those surveyed share this view and want Isabel II to be the last queen of Australia.
 At one end of the scale, twenty nine percent of people think Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible,
 The Olympic gold medallist had to compete in the 100 and 200 metres freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth games, but his physical condition has been called into question following his complaints.
 He has not been able to take medicines to relieve the pain, because they are banned from use in the games.
 On January twenty five, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and professor of computer science at the University of central Missouri,
 Many people verified the finding through the use of various types of hardware and software and by the beginning of February,
 Comets may have served as a source of water and organic matter, which have the ability to form proteins and support life.
 The expectation of scientists is to understand how planets originate, in particular ours, given that comets have been hitting the earth a long time ago.
 Cuomo, who is 53, assumed the governorship at the beginning of the year and last month signed a bill allowing people of the same sex to marry.
 He called the rumors, political gossip and nonsense.
 It is rumored that he will run for President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that, according to the Federal Aviation Administration, would reduce the distances of air routes, which would save millions of gallons of fuel per year, as well as reduce carbon emissions.
 It employs satellite technology, in contrast to the old ground-based radar technology, in order to enable air traffic controllers to detect aircraft with greater precision and to provide pilots with more accurate data.
 No additional transportation will be implemented and trains will not stop at Wembley.
 Due to the concern generated by the possible lack of transportation, the possibility of the game being played to a closed gate without the fans of the team was considered.
 On Thursday, the Journal Science reported on the discovery of a new bird species in the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Experts from Princeton University in the United States and from Uppsala University in Sweden,
 Gold can take on all sorts of shapes and curl up into tiny figures.
 Not only can it be hammered and rolled into sheets, but it can also be stretched to make a very fine wire that can be twisted and braided.
 It can be made very thin and adhered to another metal, and it is so thin that it was once used to decorate the illustrations in hand-made books called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make a pH indicator using red grape juice.
 The color of the cabbage juice will be altered depending on how acidic or basic the chemical is.
 The number of hydrogen ions present in the chemical being analyzed determines its pH level.
 The atoms of hydrogen are composed of a proton and an electron.
 Agitate both dry powders together, and after doing so, with the hands hygienized and moist,
 There will be a reaction between the moisture in your hands and the outer layers of your skin, which will feel strange to the touch and form a sort of armor.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had toilets with a flushing system in almost all the houses, which connected to a sophisticated drainage system.
 In some Minoan houses in Crete and Santorini, Greece, there are vestiges of sewer systems.
 There were also toilets in ancient Egypt, Persia and China, and in the Roman civilization, public baths had toilets, some of which were shared by men and women.
 When one is communicating with someone who is thousands of miles away, one is using a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call, and then it reflects it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space via a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space,
 A rocket of more than one hundred feet in height is required to carry a satellite or telescope into outer space.
 The wheel has modified the world in surprising ways. The most relevant thing it has done for us is to give us a much simpler and faster transportation.
 Thanks to it, we have many means of transportation, such as the railroad or the automobile, among many others.
 Below, there are smaller cats that feed on medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small cats, including the domestic cats that we keep as pets,
 The secret of their success is the concept of the niche,
 Lions are the most social of all cats, and live in groups called prides.
 The herds are made up of one to three adult males of the same family group, united with up to thirty females and their young.
 In general, females are closely related to each other, making them a large family of sisters and daughters.
 The lion's mane is a dish based on herbs and spices, together with either meat or vegetables.
 An all-round athlete, the tiger has the ability to climb, swim, jump, and pull five times as much as a robust person.
 The tiger is of the same genus, Panthera, as lions, leopards and jaguars, the only four felines capable of roaring.
 The tiger's roar is not a full-throated roar like the lion's, but rather a series of words spoken in grunts and guttural cries.
 Ocelots enjoy eating small creatures, and will, if possible, hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds,
 Scientists believe that ocelots track and find animals to eat by smelling the ground where they have passed.
 They have very good night vision and in dark places they move very silently,
 When a small group of living beings, a small population,
 The new environment has different resources and competitors, and therefore a new population will need different characteristics or adaptations from what it had before to be a strong competitor.
 There have been no changes in the original population, which still needs the same adaptations as in the past.
 As time goes on, as the incipient population begins to adapt to the new environment, it begins to look less and less like the other population.
 And finally, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that they will not be classed as belonging to the same species.
 This process is called speciation, which simply means the development of new species, and is an ineludible and fundamental consequence of evolution.
 Plants generate the oxygen that people breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that people exhale.
 The food of plants is generated by the energy of the sun, through Photosynthesis, and they also give us shade.
 We build our houses from plants and with them we also make our clothes most of the food we eat is made from plants and without plants the animals would not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the apex predator of its time, and therefore, feared nothing, excepting other Mosasaurs.
 Its long jaws had more than 70 sharp teeth, plus another group of teeth in the palate, so that anything that passed in front of it had no escape.
 We have no proof, but it could have had the viperine diet, which included turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and even could have been a cannibal.
 He also attacked any creature that entered the water, not even a dinosaur as big as the T . Rex was a threat to him.
 Although most of the foods we eat are quite familiar, the Romans also ate some rather unusual items at their banquets, such as wild boar, peacocks, snails, and even a type of rodent called a hedgehog.
 Another thing that distinguished the poor from the rich was that the poor and the women ate sitting on a chair, while the rich and the men enjoyed sharing meals and eating side by side.
 It's not possible that the recipes of ancient Rome included foods that came to Europe from America or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they had no corn, no tomatoes, no potatoes, and no chocolate.
 The Babylonians built for each of their gods a central temple considered their home.
 The people carried sacrifices to the gods and the priests sought to satisfy the needs of those by performing ceremonies and festivals.
 The temples had an open courtyard and then a sacred inner sanctuary to which only the priests could enter.
 In some cases, they built special pyramidal towers, called ziggurats,
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for their deity.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was of little importance.
 The Jewish families spent most of their time outdoors.
 The women cooked in the yard, the shops were just showrooms that opened onto the street,
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests, and therefore wood was extremely expensive.
 Very few inhabitants lived in Greenland, and according to the Norse Sagas, Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder,
 Even so, in spite of his discovery, the Eskimo tribes were already inhabiting the place at that time.
 Although each country was separate, there were marked differences between Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National treasure, you might think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 But, although the reverse of the document contains something written, it is not a map of a treasure.
 The Declaration of Independence has the words, in its original form, written on the back of the document,
 Although it is not known for certain who wrote it, it is known that the enormous parchment document, which measures 29¾ inches by 24½ inches,
 So it is likely that the annotation was added only as a label.
 Although the landings carried out during D-Day, as well as the subsequent ensuing battles, had achieved the liberation of northern France,
 His government was in the hands of the Vichy French, who had agreed to a peace with the Germans in 1940 and were working with the invaders instead of fighting against them.
 On August fourteen, nineteen forty, the so-called operation Dragon,
 In just two weeks, the American and French forces had liberated the South of France and were moving on to Germany.
 You can define a civilization as a specific culture that is shared by a large group of people who live and work together,
 The term civilization derives from the Latin civilis, which means civil, and is related to the word civis,
 Cities are the precursors of nations, a culture of civilization entails a long-term transmission of knowledge, a long-lived cultural legacy, and a homogeneous propagation.
 Minority cultures often disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces, and do not achieve recognition as civilizations in their own right.
 During the war, the thirteen States formed, at first, a central government under the Articles of Confederation,
 The Congress had no power to levy taxes, and since it had no executive or judicial power,
 He was not even empowered to annul laws or tariffs between the States.
 The articles required the unanimous approval of all the States to proceed with their amendment, and the States gave so little importance to the central government that their representatives would often absent themselves.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German national team, is the second most successful team in the world and won the FIFA world cup in 2006.
 Among the most popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, fencing, Rugby, Cycling, ice hockey, and Formula 1 racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern regions, with athletes participating in international tournaments and the Olympics.
 Japan has about 7,000 islands, making it the seventh largest archipelago in the world.
 Due to the conglomerate of Islands that it contains, Japan is often referred to as an archipelago from a geographical point of view.
 The history of Taiwan dates back to the fifteenth century, when sailors from Europe who were sailing by the place registered the name of the island as Ilha Formosa,
 The establishment in 1624 by the Dutch East India company of a base in South-East Taiwan,
 The Qing dynasty Army took control of the northern and western coastal region of Taiwan in 1683 and declared Taiwan a province of the Qing dynasty in 1885.
 In 1895, after being defeated during the first Sino-Japanese war,
 Machu Picchu has three main structures, the Intihuatana, the temple of the sun, and the temple of the three windows.
 The majority of the buildings at the ends of the complex have been reconstructed so that tourists can see how they originally looked.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and work continues to this day.
 To illustrate, the most common format of still photography worldwide is the 35 mm, which was the most commonly used film size at the end of the analogue era.
 Today it's still being produced, but the most important thing is that its dimensional relationship has been transferred to the image sensor formats of Digital cameras.
 In fact, the 35 mm format is somewhat confusing, as its dimensions are 36 mm wide by 24 mm high.
 For this reason, the ratio of the two numbers is sometimes called the Golden ratio,
 Many typical formats, such as the APS group,
 The rule of thirds, which has been the subject of much derision and has been ridiculed many times, is a simple rule that generates dynamism while allowing for some order to the images.
 The most effective position to place the central object is at the intersection of the horizontal and vertical lines that divide the image into thirds.
 During this phase of European history, the Catholic Church, which had accumulated wealth and power, was questioned.
 For more than a millennium, Christianity had united the European States, despite their different languages and customs.
 His power, present everywhere, affected everyone, from the monarch to the plebeian.
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the funds of the church should be reserved for that specific function.
 The central dome of the church had been in Rome for more than a millennium, and this concentration of power and money made many people wonder if this principle was being respected.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 Although the strategy, which involved the interruption of vital military and civilian supplies, was successful,
 Britain extracted international waters in entire sectors of the ocean to block the entry of ships, even putting at risk neutral vessels.
 Having received a reduced response to this tactic, Germany thought it would face a similar response to its unrestricted U-Boat war.
 Throughout the nineteen twenty s, the attitude of most citizens and nations was one of pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of the first World War, countries wanted to avoid such a situation happening again in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to take a job with the Edison company in New York.
 He arrived in the U S . with four cents, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 The old China had a unique way of delimiting the different periods of time, each stage or each family in power constituted a different dynasty.
 And between each dynasty, there was also a period of instability, with provinces divided.
 During these stages, a bloody war broke out between many nobles who were vying for the throne.
 One of the most bloody periods in the history of ancient China was the three kingdoms period, where thousands of people died in a struggle to occupy the throne of the great Palace in Xi'an.
 There are many political and social consequences, such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to Republicanism,
 And after the Revolution, the posts were open to all male candidates, which allowed the most ambitious and prestigious to succeed.
 The same is true of the military, for instead of basing the Army on classes,
 The French Revolution was also a source of inspiration for many other people in the repressed working class of other countries to take up their own revolutions.
 Mahomet was deeply interested in matters beyond this worldly life, and used to visit a cave on the mountain of Noor,
 The cave itself, which has endured through time, illustrates very realistically the spiritual inclinations of Muhammad.
 At the top of one of the mountains to the North of Mecca, lies a cave totally cut off from the rest of the planet.
 In fact, it is very difficult to find, even if one is sure of its existence.
 Nothing can be seen or heard from the interior of this cave,
 Of the seven wonders, the only one that still stands is the great pyramid of Cheops.
 The great pyramid, built by the Egyptian people in the third century BC, is one of many structures of this shape and size built to honor the deceased Pharaoh.
 The great majority of Hong Kong Island's urban development is densely packed on reclaimed land along the northern shore.
 The great pyramid was built in honor of the Pharaoh Khufu, and many other smaller ones, tombs and temples, were built in honor of his wives and family.
 The mark of the upward arc is similar to a V and the mark of the downward arc is similar to a grip or a square without its bottom edge.
 Arriba means to start at the point and push the bow, and Abajo means to start at the heel, where the hand holds the bow, and to pull it.
 The upward movement of the arc generates a softer, more mellow sound, while a downward one is louder and more abrupt.
 Feel free to make your own marks with a pencil, but please remember that the marks on the bowed instruments have been made there for a musical purpose and should be respected.
 On October six, seventeen eighty nine, a mob of market women forced the terrified monarch, Louis the sixteenth,
 They traveled back to Paris in a carriage surrounded by a mob that shouted and hurled threats at the King and the queen.
 The crowd forced the King and the queen to open all the windows of their carriage.
 At one point, a participant in the riot shook the head of a guard who had been executed in Versailles in front of the queen, who was in a panic.
 The Filipino people themselves paid the costs of the U S . imperialism in conquering the Philippines.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial regime in order to pay off most of the bonds that fluctuated in the name of the Philippine government in the Wall Street banks.
 And from now on, the super profits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people would constitute the principal gains of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, we need to understand the context that gave rise to the order.
 The period of time in which these events took place is commonly known as the high Middle Ages, between the eleventh, twelfth, and thirteenth centuries,
 The early Middle Ages were preceded by the early Middle Ages and were followed by the late Middle Ages, which, by convention,
 The technological determinism is a concept that comprises, pragmatically, a wide range of ideas, from the impulse or the technological imperative to a strict sense of the fact that there is a deep underlying logic that drives the destiny of humanity and that relates to the laws of science and how they are seen to be embodied in technology.
 Almost all interpretations of technological determinism have in common two general ideas that the development of technology itself unfolds along a path independent of any cultural or political influence,
 To give one example, one might argue that the existence of automobiles necessarily derives in the development of highways.
 However, a national road network is not viable economically for a small volume of cars, and new techniques of manufacture are being designed to reduce the costs of owning a car.
 The massive use of automobiles also generates a greater incidence of traffic accidents, which leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health to repair the damaged bodies.
 The element of cultural determinism was very much present in Romanticism, according to scholars like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of the Romanticism, geography shaped people, and over time, customs and cultures developed that were in harmony with the location of that society,
 As well as Paris being known as the city of fashion in the present day, Constantinople was considered as such in feudal Europe.
 His fame as a center of luxury began around 400 BC and extended until around 1100 BC.
 During the twelfth century, its status declined, especially because, on their return, the crusaders brought back gifts such as silks and spices, which were given greater value than the goods offered in Byzantine markets.
 The title of fashion capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The apex of the Gothic style took place in the period between the X-XI and the XIV.
 At first, the style of dress was greatly influenced by Byzantine culture in the East.
 Despite this, however, due to the slowness of communication channels, Western styles could be delayed by as much as twenty five to thirty years.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style, one of the most significant developments of that period was that, as a result of the Crusades, people began to use buttons to fasten their clothes.
 Sustainable agriculture is understood to be that which aims to produce enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his or her family.
 The agriculture of subsistence is a simple, generally organic, practice that combines the use of seed stocks originating from the ecological region with the rotation of crops or other comparatively simple methods to maximize production.
 Historically, much of the farmers' main activity was subsistence agriculture, which is still practiced in many developing countries.
 Subcultures congregate individuals with similar ideas and feelings of marginalization from the mainstream and gives them a sense of identity.
 There are many factors that can distinguish subcultures age, Ethnicity, class, location, or gender of its members.
 The characteristics that distinguish a subculture may be linguistic, aesthetic, sexual, geographic, or related to religion or politics, or a combination of factors.
 It is common for members of a subculture to exhibit distinctive and symbolic features of their membership, such as fashions, gestures, and jargon.
 One of the most common mechanisms used to graph the importance of socialization is to analyze the few and lamentable cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune or intentional abuse,
 These children are often referred to as wild children, and some are confined by people, generally their parents.
 It is possible that the wild children had suffered traumatic or severe childhood abuse before they were abandoned or ran away.
 It is said that others were raised by animals and that some have lived by themselves in the wild.
 When the wild child is raised exclusively by animals other than humans, it displays almost identical behaviors to the specific animal that raised it,
 Even though project-based learning should facilitate that process and make it more interesting, the scaffolding goes a little bit further.
 The scaffolding is not a learning technique, it is, rather, a support that provides support to those who are going through a new experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 The scaffolding can be in real or virtual form, to say it in another way, a teacher is a type of scaffolding, but so is the animated little paper clip in Microsoft office.
 Virtual scaffolds are embedded in the software and their function is to question, stimulate, or explain procedures that may have been complex for the student on their own.
 It is a place where children are cared for a variety of reasons, from neglect to abuse and even extortion.
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment where there is no love, no care, and no education.
 We can see that the family care system provides a safe environment for these children.
 The goal of our foster care system is to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, sustained education, and reliable medical care.
 The goal of foster care is to meet all the needs that were not being met in the child's previous home.
 The Internet unites and mixes components of mass communication and communication between people.
 The different features of the Internet open up new dimensions from the perspective of the concept of uses and rewards.
 For example, learning and socialization are cited as significant incentives for Internet use.
 During a study of user reactions to Websites conducted by Eighmey and McCord,
 Through the recording of videos, important findings have been made in the interpretation of micro expressions, which are movements in the face of only a few thousandths of a second.
 Specifically, it is argued that through the proper reading of their micro-expressions, it is possible to detect whether a person is lying.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article the President's speech, explained how those who cannot understand speech because of brain damage can nevertheless evaluate sincerity with precision.
 Even suggests that the ability to interpret human behaviour is shared with animals like domestic dogs.
 Throughout the twentieth century, researchers have demonstrated that there are two groups of genetic variation,
 The process of mutation incorporates a new genetic variation, the process of selection removes it from that set of variations.
 Segregation and recombination play a role in the variation from one generation to the next.
 On the savannah, it is not easy for a primate, whose digestive system is the same as ours,
 And if you don't do it, it causes serious problems, like stunted growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The proteins present in leaves and legumes would have been the most easily available source of vegetable protein, but they are not easily digested by primates like ourselves, unless they are cooked.
 On the other hand, foods derived from animals, such as ants, termites, and eggs, are easy to digest and provide a large number of proteins that contain all the essential amino acids.
 In the end, it should not surprise us if our own ancestors solved their own protein problems in the same way that chimpanzees do today.
 The interruption of sleep consists in waking up intentionally during the normal period of sleep and then falling asleep again after a short time.
 This can be easily accomplished with a more or less gentle alarm clock that will cause him to return to a waking state,
 The registration is an additional requirement for the visa process. In some countries, you will have to register your presence and the address of your accommodation with the local authorities.
 Other options that are based on the biological rhythm consist in drinking a lot of liquid water or tea, known as a diuretic,
 The level of inner peace a person enjoys is inversely related to the amount of tension in his body and in his spirit.
 The more you have, the more you can give to others, and the more you can give to others, the more you have.
 We all can reach enlightenment . The only thing that obstructs the path is our tension and negativity.
 Although the foundations of Tibetan Buddhism are the teachings of the Buddha, it has extended to the Mahayana path of love and numerous yoga techniques from India.
 In general, Lao-Tzu is very simple, based on Kundalini yoga, meditation, and the way of love that encompasses everything.
 In Kundalini yoga, the Kundalini energy is activated through yoga positions, breathing exercises, Mantras, or visualizations.
 Tibetan meditation centers around the Deity Yoga, which focuses on the visualization of various deities,
 Cooperation between the USSR and the USA was the result of facing a common enemy, Germany, during the Second World War,
 Two years after the end of the war, those who had been allies were now enemies, and the cold war began.
 It would last for the next forty years and would be fought in earnest, through proxy wars, from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba, among many other places.
 Because by September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already broken,
 Despite these plans, however, these plans fell into disuse almost overnight when more than 800,000 Soviet Army troops entered and formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after invading the Eastern regions of Poland,
 To use ships to transport goods is a much more efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The function of the Navy has always been to ensure that its country can move its people and goods, while at the same time, interfering with the enemy's ability to do the same.
 The Atlantic campaign in the Second World War is one of the most clear and recent examples of this.
 At the same time, the German Navy, using mostly submarines,
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany might have taken power in Britain, as it had done in the rest of Europe.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 In order to obtain their milk, hair, flesh and skin, the ancient peoples and tribes began to steal them.
 Goats were generally kept in herds that wandered over hills or other grazing areas, often tended by shepherds who were usually boys or adolescents,
 In England, railways had been installed by the sixteenth century.
 Even though the rails of the cars were made of simple parallel boards of wood, they allowed the horses that drew them to reach a greater speed and to haul heavier loads than on the rougher roads of the day.
 The incorporation of sleepers to keep the rails in place occurred quite early, but gradually it was realised that the rails would be more efficient if they were lined with iron on the top.
 This became a common practice, although the iron caused greater wear and tear on the wooden wheels.
 Eventually, wooden wheels were replaced with iron ones, and in 1767, solid iron rails began to be used.
 The first mode of transportation that we know of was walking,
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not have the habit of walking erect.
 Although bipedalism has been found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, it is possible that Sahelanthropus walked on two feet as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living a more environmentally friendly life, join environmental movements, or even become activists and fight to reduce, in some way, the future suffering.
 And in many cases, it's not just a temporary situation, but it's a situation that needs to be addressed and dealt with.
 It is obvious that the world has undergone great changes, resulting from the technological and scientific advances of mankind, and the problems have intensified because of overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of people.
 After being approved by the Congress on July four, a handwritten and signed draft was sent to the printing press of John Dunlap, a few blocks away.
 During the night, between one hundred and fifty to two hundred copies were made, which are now known as the Dunlap copies.
 John Nixon was the first to read it, on July eight,
 On July six, a copy was sent to George Washington, who ordered it to be read to his Army in New York on July nine.
 The twenty five photographs by Dunlap, which are known to still exist, are the oldest copies of the document that are known to still exist.
 A large number of Paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and is alive today,
 Many people do not picture dinosaurs as having feathers and being able to fly.
 However, there are many characteristics in birds that still resemble dinosaurs.
 They have scaly limbs and claws, lay eggs, and move on their hind legs like the T-Rex.
 And nowadays, almost all computers work on the basis of manipulating data Encoded in the Binary system.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values, they are the 0 and the 1, and in computer jargon, these numbers are called Binary digits, or bits.
 The internal poisoning may not be evident at once, and its symptoms, such as vomiting, are too common to be able to make an immediate diagnosis.
 The most obvious indicator of internal poisoning may be found in the discovery of an open bottle of toxic chemicals or household cleaning products.
 Read the label for specific first aid information for that specific venom.
 Entomologists use the term insect parasite in a formal sense to refer to this group of arthropods.
 The word comes from its ancient relation to bed bugs, a species highly developed to parasitize humans.
 Bed bugs and Chiggers are nidicolous, meaning they are adapted to live in the nests or homes of their hosts.
 In the United States, the number of cases of multiple sclerosis,
 The central nervous system, the brain, the spinal cord and the optic nerve, is the target of multiple sclerosis.
 Studies have shown that women are twice as likely as men to suffer from MS.
 A couple might conclude that raising a baby would not be the most convenient thing for them or for the child.
 These couples could choose to plan for the adoption of a baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that a different couple can take care of the child.
 The goal of science is to unravel the way the world works through the scientific method,
 It's not, however, an experiment, it's a test that is used to rule out one or more of the possible hypotheses, by asking questions and making observations that guide scientific inquiry.
 The focus of both naturalists and philosophers was put on the classical works, especially on the Latin version of the Biblical text.
 The thoughts of Aristotle, especially the questions of science, even the psychology, were accepted.
 As the Greek language was declining, Western Europe distanced itself from its Greek roots, both philosophical and scientific.
 Often, many rhythms in physiology and in behavior depend critically on internal cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not only responses to regular external stimuli, have been recorded in almost all living things, even bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 The biological clocks oscillate in a self-sustained way and have a free cyclical period, even if there are no external stimuli.
 One of the key indicators that DNA was a genetic material was the experiment conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase inserted their own DNA into a bacterium using Phage, or viruses.
 They performed two experiments in which they tagged the fago's DNA with radioactive phosphorus or the DNA's protein with radioactive sulfur.
 Depending on the type of mutation, the significance of the affected piece of genetic material, and whether it involves germ cells,
 Only mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while those that occur in other parts can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism is often focused on visiting natural areas to enjoy the scenery, including wildlife and vegetation.
 Some examples of possible activities at the site are: hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, and visiting parks, and studying information about the ecosystem.
 An example is to visit, take photographs and learn about orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small towns in their cars to go to their jobs and they often cross each other on the way to their jobs.
 In this dynamic transfer Lifter, everyone is in some way connected to a system of transportation based on the use of private automobiles,
 Currently, scientists hold that this massive carbon economy has deprived the biosphere of one of its regular states that has contributed to the evolution of humanity over the last two million years.
 Everyone is part of the society and uses the transportation systems, and almost everyone complains about them.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear such levels of complaint about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 So what is the reason for the complaints and why do they occur daily?
 The flow of traffic is the study of the individual movement of drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions between them.
 Unfortunately, it is not a simple task to study the flow of traffic, as it is not possible to make exact predictions about the behavior of drivers.
 Fortunately, there is a tendency in drivers to maintain a relatively consistent behavior, which allows the traffic flows to have a logical consistency and can be the object of approximate mathematical representation.
 In order to graphically illustrate the flow of circulation, relationships were established between the three most important elements: flow, density and velocity.
 These relationships facilitate both planning and design as well as operations of the vial devices.
 The first creatures to fly were insects, which helped them to evade enemies more easily and to find food and mates more effectively.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back, and pin them to the sides of their bodies.
 This gives them a wider range of small places to hide from predators.
 At present, the Orthoptera and the Neuroptera are the only insects incapable of folding their wings.
 Millennia ago, a man named Aristarchus commented that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 There were those who shared his theory, but many others believed the opposite, that the solar system, including the sun,
 This seems to make sense, since on earth we do not perceive its motion, correct?
 The Amazon River is the largest by volume and the second longest in the world, containing eight times more water than the next largest river.
 And the Amazon is the widest River in the world, in some places as much as six miles wide.
 Of the total water that flows from the world's rivers into the oceans, twenty percent comes from the Amazon.
 The great River Amazon has a length of 6,387 km and receives water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although the stone pyramids continued to be built until the end of the Old Kingdom, they never equaled those of Giza, either in size or in the sublime technique of their construction.
 The ancient Egyptians of the new empire were amazed at the monuments of their ancestors, which at that time were over a thousand years old.
 With approximately 800 inhabitants, Vatican city is the smallest independent country in the world and the smallest in terms of population.
 The Italian is used in the Vatican city, both for drafting its legislation and for issuing its official communications.
 The language spoken daily by the majority of those who work within the state is also Italian, and the use of Latin is generally reserved for religious ceremonies.
 The total number of citizens living in Vatican city is estimated to be around one thousand.
 The basic chemicals gold, silver and copper have been known since antiquity,
 The philosopher Aristotle developed the theory that everything is made up of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 It was more like the states of matter, solid, liquid, gaseous, and plasma, only that at the same time it had the theory that they are transformed into new substances that make up the things we see.
 Alloys are basically a combination of two or more metals . remember, the periodic table has many elements.
 Metals are considered to be elements such as calcium and potassium, and there are also metals such as gold and silver.
 It is also possible that there are alloys with small amounts of elements, such as carbon, that are not metallic.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter, which is composed of tiny particles called atoms.
 The size of atoms is so immeasurably small that the end of this sentence could contain billions of them.
 When it was invented, the pencil won many friends.
 Unfortunately, as a result of the new writing methods, the pencil is used less and has lost its status.
 Nowadays, people write messages on the screens of their computers, and they don't even need to approach a typewriter.
 What will happen to the keyboard when something new and better comes along?
 The atomic bomb operates on the principle that energy is required to form a nucleus with a large number of protons and neutrons.
 It's similar to what happens when you roll a heavy car up a hill,
 The nuclei of some atoms are unstable, that is, they tend to disintegrate with a minimum or almost no push.
 The surface of the moon is composed of rocks and dust, and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and about 100 km thick on the far side.
 It is thinner under the lunar seas and thicker under the highlands.
 It is possible that there are more seas on the near side due to its thinner crust, which made it easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 Theories of content focus on what it is that attracts or pleases people.
 These doctrines hold that people have certain needs or desires that have been internalized as they grew up to maturity.
 These theories analyze what it is that causes certain people to want the things they do and what factors in their environment compel or oblige them to do or not do certain things.
 There are two theories that are very well known, the hierarchy of needs, by Maslow, and the two-factor theory, by Hertzberg.
 In general, there are two types of behavior when managers begin to lead their former colleagues.
 To the managers of this category it is difficult to make decisions which are unpopular with the employees, to impose disciplinary measures, to make performance evaluations, to assign responsibilities, and to demand accountability from the personnel.
 At the other end of the spectrum, he or she becomes an unrecognizable person who believes it is necessary to change everything that the group has been doing up to that point and to do it in his or her own way.
 In the end, the leader is ultimately responsible for the success or failure of the team.
 This form of behavior often ends up distancing the leaders from the rest of the team.
 The same high standards that are applied to conventional teams apply to the virtual teams, although there are some minor differences.
 And the members of a virtual team often act as a point of contact for their closest physical team.
 They generally enjoy greater autonomy than the members of a traditional group, thanks to the fact that it is possible for their teams to meet according to different time zones,
 The existence of a real invisible team,
 The invisible team is the group in charge of the management and to which each member reports.
 What motive could an organization have for going through the process of establishing a learning organization?
 When all the resources available are used appropriately in the operating departments of an organization, it generates room for creativity and ingenuity.
 And it's possible that the process of a team working together to overcome a difficulty will lead to a new and innovative process to meet the needs of the customers.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must first generate a culture of innovation, as well as a shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel, in 2006, explains the continuous improvement method as a method used to help organizations achieve a higher level of performance.
 Neurobiological data offer factual evidence for a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition,
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior contributes to the research of scientists.
 For a long time it has been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumours affect behaviour and cause changes in mental functions.
 Thanks to the new technologies, we have the possibility of seeing and investigating structures and processes that have never before been seen.
 This gives us abundant information and material to develop simulation models, which enhance our understanding of mental processes.
 Although it is often associated with science fiction, it is a specialty within computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of a machine.
 Research in the field of ai involves the development of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of this include monitoring, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer inquiries and consultations, as well as face, handwriting and voice recognition.
 These are now separate disciplines, focused on offering solutions to real-life problems.
 The system of artificial intelligence is now often used in the sectors of the economy, medicine, engineering and the military, in the same way it was incorporated in various applications of Video-Games and personal computers.
 Study tours are an important part of every classroom. It is very common for a teacher to want to take her or his students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 The solution comes from technology, through virtual tours, where students can observe objects in a museum, visit an Aquarium, or contemplate beautiful works of art, sitting with their class.
 Sharing a field trip in a virtual setting is also a great way to reflect on a field trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year, the students at Bennett school in North Carolina design a Website about their trip to the state capital, and every year the Website is updated, but the previous versions are kept Online as a kind of scrapbook.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing skills . Although students usually start their Blogging experience with poor grammar and spelling,
 Because students are the most critical readers, the Blog writer begins to strive to improve his writing,
 Blogging also requires students to be more aware of the world around them.
 Blogs are a resource that inspire collaboration and encourage students to go beyond the typical school day.
 The proper use of Blogs can empower students to be more analytical and critical,
 Ottawa is the bilingual capital of Canada and has a variety of museums and art galleries that display the history and the present of the country.
 Niagara falls is to the South, and the North is home to the natural beauty of Muskoka and the area that follows.
 All of these aspects, among others, are what make Ontario stand out as intrinsically Canadian in the eyes of foreigners.
 The larger areas to the North are sparsely populated, and some are wilderness, almost uninhabited.
 To make a population comparison that causes great surprise to many,
 The location of the East African Islands is off the coast of East Africa, in the Indian ocean.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and a continent in itself if we are talking about wildlife.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent or associated with France and are popular for their beaches and luxury tourist complexes.
 Islam was also brought to the Islands by the Arabs and was, to a large extent, imposed in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The first point of European and colonial influence took place in the fifteenth century, with the discovery of the Cape of Good Hope by the Portuguese explorer, Vasco Da Gama.
 It is bordered by the Sahel to the North, and the Atlantic ocean to the South and West.
 Ladies, it is advised that all female visitors state they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It will also be useful to use a ring,
 Women must be aware that cultural differences can cause what they consider to be harassment, and that it is not uncommon for them to be followed, taken by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in rejecting men and do not hesitate to defend your position,
 The founders of the modern city of Casablanca were the Berber fishermen during the tenth century BC and the Phoenicians, Romans, and Merinids used it as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 It was destroyed and rebuilt by the Portuguese under the name of Casa Branca, but in 1755 it was abandoned after a terrible earthquake.
 The city was rebuilt by the Moroccan Sultan with the name of Daru l-Badya and the Spanish traders who settled there called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring places in all of Morocco to go shopping.
 In the outskirts of the old Medina, there are plenty of places where you can buy traditional Moroccan items, such as clay pots, ceramics, leather goods, water pipes and a whole range of trinkets, although all is geared to tourists.
 Goma is a tourist attraction in the eastern Democratic Republic of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In two thousand and two, the lava from the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma and left much of its streets underwater, especially in the city's center.
 Although Goma is quite safe, any visit to the outside should be considered in order to take note of the situation of the enmities that persist in the province of North Kivu.
 And on the other hand, the city is the base for climbing the Nyiragongo volcano and its gorilla trekking excursions are some of the cheapest in Africa.
 To get around within Goma, you can opt for a boda-boda, which is a motorcycle taxi.
 This, added to the fact that it is relatively inaccessible, has given Tombuctoo an exotic and remote air.
 Although today, Timbuktu is a depleted city, it still has an airport and its reputation makes it a tourist attraction.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of world heritage sites in danger, because of the threat of the desert sands.
 It was one of the stops on Henry Louis Gates's special, Wonders of the African world, on PBS.
 The city contrasts much with the rest of the country, as it has a more Arabic than African style.
 The Kruger National Park is located in northeastern South Africa and extends along the border with Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the north, and the Crocodile River to the south.
 The park has an area of 19,500 km2 and is divided into 14 distinct ecozones, each of which has a different wildlife.
 This is one of the most important attractions in South Africa and is recognized as the main icon of South Africa's National Parks.
 As in all of South Africa's nature reserves, there are daily fees for conservation and for access to the park.
 It may also be convenient to buy a Wild Card which allows entry to selections of parks in South Africa or to all the National Parks of the country.
 The territory of Hong Kong takes its name from the homonymous Island, which is the destination of most tourists.
 The deployment of buildings that delimit the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a graphic of light bars that is evidenced by the presence of the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 The best way to enjoy the best views of Hong Kong is to get off the island and head to the Kowloon waterfront.
 It is in the reclaimed lands of the North Coast of Hong Kong where its urban development is concentrated,
 This is the site that the British conquerors adopted as their own, so if you want to see evidence of the colonial past of this region,
 The Sundarbans are the world's largest Mangrove forest, stretching 80 km from the coast of Bangladesh and India.
 The UNESCO has declared the Sundarbans a heritage site. The section of the forest within the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 And yet, despite this, the forests are not just Mangroves, but they also contain some of the last remaining trees from the once impenetrable jungles that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans comprise an area of 3,850 square kilometres and nearly a third of its area is covered by water or swampy areas.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary and it is estimated that there are now about 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 Buses leave from the inter-district station across the river all day, although most, especially those going to Jakar and Bumthang, leave between 6:30 and 7:30 a M.
 Because buses between districts are often crowded with passengers, it is recommended to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Almost all districts have the service of Japanese Coaster buses, which are comfortable and durable.
 Sharing a taxi is a quick and convenient way to get to nearby places such as Paro and Punakha.
 The Oyapock bridge is a suspension bridge that crosses the Oyapock River, connecting Oiapoque, a Brazilian city, and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, in French Guiana.
 The two towers reach a height of 83 m, with a length of 378 m and two lanes of 3.5 m wide.
 Beneath the bridge is a 15-meter-wide space that was not opened to traffic until March 2017.
 The full operation of the bridge is estimated for September 2017, which is when the Brazilian customs controls are expected to be completed.
 The area that is now Eastern Paraguay was inhabited by the Guaraní people, who were the most important indigenous group in the region, and who lived as hunter-gatherers,
 The Chaco region was home to other aboriginal groups, for example, the Guaycurú and Payaguá, who hunted, gathered and fished as a means of subsistence.
 Paraguay, formerly known as the great province of the Indies, was born in the sixteenth century as a result of the encounter between the Spanish conquerors and the indigenous peoples.
 The Spanish gave rise to the colonial period, which lasted for three centuries.
 Since Asuncion was established in 1537, Paraguay has been able to conserve much of its aboriginal idiosyncrasy and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The most important tournament of the year takes place in December at the polo fields of Las Cañitas.
 There are also other minor tournaments and matches held at other times of the year.
 You can find information about the tournaments and where to buy tickets for the polo games on the Argentine polo Association's Website.
 The Falkland Islands pound, the official currency of the Falkland Islands, is pegged to the British pound sterling.
 There is a single bank in the Islands, where you can change your money. It is opposite the FIC West store in Stanley.
 Pound Sterling is accepted everywhere in the Islands, and you can also pay in Stanley with credit cards or U S . dollars.
 There are chances that in the outer Islands, credit cards will not be accepted, but you could use British or American money.
 It is practically impossible to change money at the Falkland Islands outside the archipelago, so try to do so before you leave.
 Because Montevideo is in the Southern hemisphere, it is summer there when in the northern hemisphere it is winter, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics, with frequent temperatures above 30° C during the summer.
 The cold winter weather can be deceptive: although it is very rare for temperatures to fall below freezing, the wind and humidity interact to make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no specific rainy or dry seasons, and the amount of rain remains almost constant throughout the year.
 Although many of the park's animals are used to seeing people, wildlife is still wildlife, so don't feed or disturb it.
 According to the park's guidelines, you must stay at least 100 yards away from bears and wolves, and 25 yards away from the rest of the wildlife.
 Despite how docile they may appear, bison, moose, deer, bears, and practically all large animals can be aggressive.
 Dozens of visitors are injured every year by not keeping a proper distance.
 And also, remember that smells attract bears and other wild animals, so you should avoid having or cooking foods that give off a lot of aroma and keep the camp clean.
 The capital of Samoa, the city of Apia, is located on the island of Upolu and has just under 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, the port was the scene of a disastrous naval confrontation when seven German, American, and British ships refused to leave the port.
 They sank all but one of the ships, a British cruiser, and killed nearly two hundred Americans and Germans.
 During the Mau movement's war for independence, a peaceful encounter in the town resulted in the assassination of the state leader, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are a large number of beaches, as Auckland has two harbours, the most well-known being in three areas.
 In the North Harbour district, on the Pacific ocean, are the beaches of North Shore, which stretch from Long Bay in the North, to Devonport in the South.
 The beaches are almost all sandy with safe places to swim and most have Pohutukawa trees that offer shade.
 In the Waitemataas, Tamaki drive beaches are on the Waitemata harbour, in the central region of Auckland.
 These are family beaches, sometimes very crowded, with numerous and varied shops available on the thing.
 Number one is the most popular local beer, and it's not complex, but rather pleasant and refreshing.
 Although there are a wide variety of French wines, those from New Zealand and Australia could be considered better for transportation.
 The local water from the tap is completely safe to drink, but if you're worried, you'll find bottled water easily available.
 Australians consider the notion of black coffee to be foreign, and a small black coffee is called an espresso,
 The hot chocolate is up to Belgian standards, and the fruit juices are expensive but delicious.
 There are numerous trips to the Reef all year round, and there, the injuries from any of these causes are rare.
 In any case, please accept the advice of the authorities, respect all the signs and pay special attention to the safety warnings.
 Cubomedusae are found near beaches and estuaries from October to April, north of 1770,
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack people, and most of them are afraid of people and would swim away.
 The ocean is not the place where saltwater crocodiles are actively found,
 The reservation of lodging in advance of the trip gives you the peace of mind that you will have a place to sleep when you arrive at your destination.
 The travel agents usually have agreements with specific hotels, although through them it is also possible to book other types of accommodation, such as camping areas.
 Travel agents usually offer packages that include breakfast, transfers to and from the airport, and even combined flights and accommodation.
 They may also hold it in reserve in case you need time to think about the offer, or to obtain other documents for your destination,
 However, any modification or request must be made through the travel agent first, and not directly through the hotel.
 At some festivals, the majority of those who attend the musical events decide to camp out, and most of the attendees consider it a crucial aspect of the experience.
 If you want to see the action close up, then you'll need to arrive early at the campgrounds to get a good seat near the musical events.
 Although the musical performances may have ended, in other areas of the festival, they could continue until high hours of the morning.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you are going to cross the North Sea in winter, find out where the cabin is located, as the noise of the ice will be very disturbing to the most affected.
 During the cruise to St . Petersburg, you also spend time in the city. You are exempt from the visa requirements if you disembark.
 Casinos usually make great efforts to maximize the time and money that their customers spend.
 They will often offer special deals on food, drink and entertainment in order to keep guests happy and within the grounds.
 Some establishments serve free spirits although drunkenness affects judgment and any good gambler knows the importance of keeping sober.
 Anyone who intends to drive in high altitudes or in mountain passes must provide for the possibility of snow, ice, or low temperatures.
 On icy or snowy roads, there is little friction, so it is not possible to drive as you would on a bare asphalt road.
 During the storms of snow it may fall a quantity of snow that will leave him trapped in a very short time.
 In addition, visibility can be reduced by snow, or by condensation or ice that forms on the car's windows.
 In many countries, on the other hand, the conditions of ice and snow are normal, and the traffic flows almost without interruption throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably the most popular tourist attraction in Africa and the most memorable part of the trip for many visitors.
 The popular use of the term safari refers to overland trips to see the amazing wildlife of Africa, particularly in the savanna.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, will approach vehicles, and standard equipment will make good viewing possible.
 Sometimes, lions, cheetahs and leopards can be shy, so you'll have more of a chance to see them using binoculars.
 The safari known as a walking safari, or a bush walk, is a walking holiday,
 The Paralympic games will take place between August twenty four and September five, two thousand and twenty one.
 Host city of the 1964 games, Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two summer Olympics.
 If you booked your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the announcement of the postponement,
 There are different types of travel cancellation policies, but as of the end of March, the coverage of most of these policies based on the Coronavirus,
 Most of the events are expected to have an entry fee of between JPY 2,500 and JPY 130,000,
 And you can use the ironing board to dry your clothes when they are still damp. Many hotels have an iron and a board to lend to travelers, even if you are not in the room.
 If you don't have a flat iron, or if you don't want to use a flat iron, you can try with a hair dryer,
 Be sure not to let the cloth get too hot, as it could shrink or, in extreme cases, burn.
 There are different methods of purifying water, some of which are more effective at dealing with specific threats.
 In some, it is enough to boil water for a minute, in others, it takes several more.
 Not all filters have the same effectiveness and, if this bothers you, you should consider buying bottled water with a seal from a certified company.
 It may happen that travellers meet with plagues of animals of which they have no knowledge in the regions from which they come.
 Pests are capable of ruining food, causing irritation, or in more serious cases, causing allergic reactions, spreading poison, or transmitting infections.
 Infectious diseases, by themselves, or dangerous animals, which can hurt or kill individuals through the use of their strength,
 The duty free purchase of goods offers an opportunity to buy, in certain places, duty free goods.
 Travelers who visit countries with a high tax rate can sometimes save a significant amount of money, particularly on things like spirits and tobacco.
 On the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, the stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont is the most challenging and often runs through desolate and lonely country.
 If you are not accustomed to driving on country roads, be alert: there are many steep hills, narrow lanes, and sharp curves.
 The speed limits are notoriously lower than in the preceding and succeeding sections, and their strict compliance is even more important than in any other section.
 And yet, curiously, the cell phone signal is much better here than in many other sections of the road, like Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastry is of good quality and in Bavaria, pastries are quite tasty and varied, similar to those made in Austria, their neighbor to the South.
 Fruit pies are common, with apples baked in during the winter and cherries and plums appearing in the summer.
 Many of the German products that are baked also have almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts.
 If you are in the mood for small but tasty pastries, try the Berliner, also known as Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 The curry is a dish of herbs and spices, and it's served with meat or vegetables.
 We can find curry dry and wet, depending on the volume of liquid.
 In the villages of the North of India and Pakistan, yogurt is used in curry,
 With 17,000 Islands to choose from, Indonesian cuisine is a generic term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines that are distributed throughout the country.
 But it is not alone, however, and the term is used to refer to the cuisine originating in the central and eastern regions of the main island of Java.
 The cuisine of Java, currently available throughout the archipelago, offers a variety of dishes seasoned with simple condiments, with predominance of the favorite aromas of the Javanese, such as peanuts, chili, sugar, and various aromatic spices.
 The other is the one that is used for the saddle,
 Although they provide greater stability to the rider, they can present safety problems, as it is possible that their feet may become jammed in them.
 If a rider is thrown off the horse, but his foot is still caught in the stirrup, he can be dragged along if the horse runs away.
 First, most riders wear boots with a heel that is pointed and fairly narrow.
 In addition, there are saddles, especially English ones, with stirrups that allow the girth to slip off its structure if a rider who is thrown out pulls backward.
 The Cochamó Valley is the most popular place in Chile to go rock climbing, and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with a variety of extensive rock walls and granite cliffs.
 The peaks also offer stunning views from the summits . Climbers from all corners of the globe are constantly delineating new paths between its walls of potential infinity.
 Downhill skiing and snowboarding are popular sports that consist of sliding down a snowy slope on skis or a board.
 Skiing is a major tourist activity with many devotees, sometimes called ski lovers, who organize their holidays completely around skiing at a specific site.
 The idea of skiing is very old, as there are cave paintings that represent skiers and that date back to around 5,000 BC.
 As a discipline, alpine skiing dates from no later than the seventeenth century, and in eighteen sixty one Norwegians inaugurated the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Hiking in the snow is also known as backcountry skiing, touring, or backcountry skiing.
 Although they are not generally associated with skiing or mountaineering in steep terrain,
 Imagine the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 Under satisfactory conditions, you will be able to cover a little more distance than if you were walking, but you will seldom reach the speed of skiing on a well-groomed slope.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries, and under normal circumstances, travelling through several countries would mean having to deal with visa applications and passport controls several times.
 But Schengen, nevertheless, functions as a single country in this regard.
 You may always move within this region without passing through a passport control again.
 In the same way, with a Schengen visa, it will not need to apply for visas to each of the Schengen countries separately, saving time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal criterion for determining when a manufactured item can be considered an antique.
 The definition varies geographically, where the age limit could be more narrowly defined in places like North America than in Europe.
 It may happen that handicrafts are classed as antiques, even though they are newer than similar articles manufactured in series.
 Reindeer herding is a way of life for the Sami people, and the culture around it is important to many who are engaged in other professions.
 Even so, even traditionally, not all the Lapp people have been dedicated to reindeer herding on a large scale, but have lived off fishing, hunting, and other similar activities, using reindeer mainly as draft animals.
 Today, many Lapplanders work in modern commercial activities. Tourism is an important source of income in Lapland, the Sámi region.
 Although it is used extensively, especially among those who are not Romani, the term Gypsy is often given a pejorative connotation,
 If your destination country is under a travel alert, it could affect your medical or cancellation insurance.
 It is possible that he will want to consult the recommendations of other governments, but they are designed for his own citizens.
 For example, a North American visitor in the Middle East might face different situations than a European or an Arab.
 The warnings are just a concise summary of the political situation in another country.
 The points of view that are presented are usually superficial,
 A severe weather event is generally defined as any weather event that is capable of causing death, injury, or damage to property.
 The severe climate can be found in any part of the planet and there are different types depending on the geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Hurricanes, drought, excessive rainfall, and forest fires are all types and consequences of extreme weather, as are thunderstorms, tornadoes, water spouts,
 Among the extreme regional and seasonal climatic phenomena we find the winds, snowstorms, and ice or dust storms.
 It is strongly recommended that travellers be informed about any extreme weather risks in the area they are visiting, as this may affect their travel plans.
 Anyone who is planning a trip to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 It is likely that searching for a course on hostile zones on the Internet will lead to the address of a local company.
 A course will usually cover all the topics that have been discussed here in much greater detail and, in general, with practical experience.
 A typical course lasts between two and five days, and includes role-playing, first aid, and sometimes even training with weapons.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are common, but publications about war zones are scarce.
 Passengers who have scheduled a sex change surgery in another country must make sure they have valid documentation for the return trip.
 The position of governments on the possibility of issuing passports without a gender declaration or updated documents to make the name of the person coincide with the gender with which they feel identified.
 The willingness of foreign governments to honor these documents varies greatly.
 Inspections at security checkpoints have become more intrusive since the September eleventh attacks.
 Transgender people who have not yet had surgery should not have to pass through the scanners with their dignity and privacy intact.
 The return currents are the flow that recedes from the waves that break on the shore, often in a reef or similar.
 Because of the submarine topography, the return flow gathers in certain areas of greater depth and there it may originate a rapid current with a direction to deep waters.
 Most of the deaths occur from the fatigue of trying to swim against the current, which is perhaps impossible.
 Once you get out of the current, swimming back will not be any more complex than usual.
 Try to get to some place where you will not be seen again or, if you have the skills and someone has seen you,
 The impact of returning home is felt before the cultural impact,
 Travelers who have found it easy to adapt to a new culture sometimes have great difficulty in returning to their native culture.
 When he returns to his home country after having lived abroad, he will have adapted to that new culture and will have lost some of the habits of his native culture.
 When you traveled abroad the first time, people were probably patient and understanding, because they knew that travelers need to adapt to a new country.
 People may not foresee that tolerance and understanding are also necessary for the returning travelers in their homes.
 The light show and the sound pyramid are one of the most interesting things for children in the area.
 In the darkness, you can see the pyramids and contemplate them in silence before the show begins.
 The story of sound and light is like a book of stories.
 The Sphinx appears as a backdrop and narrator of a long history.
 The scenes are projected on the pyramids and all of them are illuminated.
 The discovery of the South Shetland Islands occurred in 1819 and several nations claim them, with the largest number of bases, reaching sixteen active in the year two thousand and twenty.
 The archipelago is 120 km north of the peninsula, and the largest island is Rey Jorge, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Other include Livingston and Deception Islands, where there is a spectacular natural harbor formed by the inundated caldera of a volcano that remains active.
 The Ellsworth land, whose limits are defined by the Bellingshausen sea, is a region that is located to the South of the peninsula.
 In this place, the mountains of the Peninsula are mixed with the plain and then rise again to form the 360 km long Ellsworth range, which is divided in two by the Minnesota glacier.
 In the northern sector, Sentinel range, are the highest peaks of Antarctica, the Vinson massif, with a summit at 4,892 metres on Mount Vinson.
 In places where cell phone coverage is not available, a satellite phone could be the only option.
 A satellite phone cannot be equated to a cell phone, because in order to make a call, one must be outdoors and have a clear line of sight to the satellite.
 The service is commonly used in water transportation, including recreational boating, as well as for expeditions that require remote data and voice.
 You can contact your local telephone service provider for more information on how to subscribe to this service.
 Combining travel and learning has become a very popular option for those planning to take a year off.
 This is very popular with school graduates, as it allows them to take a year off before going to university without jeopardizing their education.
 In many cases, enrolling in a study abroad program for a year can, in fact, increase the chances of getting into higher education once one returns to the home country.
 There will be a fee for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is an excellent place to sail in, with its thousands of lakes and thousands of islands, both in the lakes and in the archipelagoes.
 A yacht is not always required in the archipelagoes and Lakes.
 Although the coastal archipelagos and the larger lakes are wide enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even a kayak provide a different experience.
 Boating is a national pastime in Finland, with a boat for every seven or eight people.
 The same is true in Norway, Sweden, and New Zealand, but, again, it's pretty unique.
 Most of the exclusive cruises that are made through the Baltic Sea include a long stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you have the possibility of making a visit to the historic city for a few days during your return trip,
 If you only disembark during shore excursions, you do not need a separate visa.
 In the brochures of some cruise lines, Berlin, Germany, appears,
 Flying in an airplane can be a scary experience for people of any age or place, particularly if they have never been through the experience or have lived through a traumatic situation.
 There is no shame in it, and it is no more than other fears and discomforts that afflict so many others.
 For some, understanding a little bit about how planes operate and what happens during a flight can help to overcome a fear that stems from a lack of knowledge or a sense of not having control.
 They are paid very well by the delivery companies to make very fast deliveries,
 The big companies had their own planes on some routes, but there was a problem for the smaller companies and other routes.
 If they shipped by air, in some routes it may have taken days to unload and clear customs.
 The only option for making it go faster was to ship it as checked baggage, and the airline regulations forbid shipping baggage without a passenger.
 The obvious way to travel first or business class on a plane is to spend a fortune on it,
 But there's a price to pay for that . In general, you can pay up to four times the economy fare in business class, and up to eleven times the economy fare in first class.
 It's usually a waste of time to look for first or business class seats on direct flights.
 The other thing is that the airlines are well aware that there is a basic group of travellers who are prepared to pay a lot of money for the privilege of getting to a place quickly and comfortably, and they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chişinău. Its regional language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a Republic composed of many ethnic groups, among which there have been conflicts of this kind.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the formation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria,
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations, the economic ties between the two parts of Moldova have been reestablished.
 Orthodox Christianity is the majority religion in Moldova.
 Esmirna is the third most important city in Turkey, with approximately 3.7 million people, the second largest port after Istanbul, and a very good transportation Hub.
 The once-great city of Smyrna is now a modern, evolved, and busy metropolis, established around a large,
 The extensive Boulevards, the mirrored facades, and the vanguard shopping centers are dotted with the traditional red tiled roofs of the eighteenth century markets and ancient mosques and churches.
 The town of Haldarsvik has excursions to the nearby island of Eysturoy and has an atypical octagonal church.
 In the cemetery, there are interesting marble sculptures in the form of doves on some of the tombs.
 It is well worth while to spend half an hour in a stroll through the fascinating town.
 To the North and within easy reach is the romantic and Alucinante city of Sintra, which gained popularity among foreigners after a vivid account of its splendor was written by Lord Byron.
 In Scotturb, bus number 403 regularly goes to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also, you should visit, to the North, the great Sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima, which is a place where there were appearances of the Virgin Mary, famous all over the world.
 And remember, you are visiting a place that served as a mass grave and is also a site of significant importance to a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women alive today who survived their time in this place and many more who had loved ones there who were murdered or worked there until their deaths,
 Give it all the dignity, solemnity, and respect that it deserves . don't make a joke out of it . don't make a joke out of the holocaust or Nazism.
 Do not ruin the place by making marks or graffiti on the structures.
 The Catalan and the Spanish are the official languages of Barcelona . Approximately half of its people prefer to speak Catalan,
 But, because Catalan is, legally, the first language of official status,
 But the Spanish is still used a lot in public transportation and other buildings.
 Although the usual announcements in the Metro are only in Catalan, the unplanned interruptions are made in a wide variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are reputed to be egocentric, rude, and arrogant.
 Although it's usually just an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to enjoy Paris is to behave as well as possible, as a well-educated person.
 A few courteous gestures on your part will quickly remove the apparent brusque manners of the parisians.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is very wooded, it has mostly beech, fir, and spruce, and it has a mixed alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 It has a wide and extraordinary range of vegetation, thanks to the variety of microclimates, soils and altitudes.
 This region is also home to a wide variety of animal and bird species.
 The European Brown bear, the Wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the wild cat, and the Urogallo, are some of the exotic, and many other ordinary, creatures that may be found in the place.
 During visits to monasteries, women must wear skirts that cover the knees and cannot wear their shoulders uncovered.
 Although almost all the monasteries give cloaks to women who arrive without being prepared, if you bring your own, especially if it is brightly colored, the monk or the nun will smile at you as you enter.
 Following the same line, men are required to wear pants that cover the knees.
 This can also be taken from the clothes available when you enter, but that clothing is not washed after every person who wears it, so it may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts.
 The cuisine of Majorca, like that of other similar regions of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and uses olive oil in all its recipes.
 The Pa amb Oli is a popular and simple meal, common especially in the summer,
 All nouns, as well as the word Sie for you, always carry their initial letter in upper case, even if they are in the middle of a sentence.
 It's a key method of differentiating between certain verbs and objects.
 It may also be said that it simplifies the reading, although its writing is somewhat complex,
 Pronouncing Italian is relatively simple, given that most of its words sound the same as they are written.
 The c and the g are the letters with which you should be most attentive, given that they are pronounced differently depending on the vowel that follows them.
 And the same is true for the r and the Rr. For example, caro means costly, while carro means automobile.
 Persian has a relatively simple and for the most part regular grammar.
 By reading this grammar book, you will learn a great deal about Persian grammar and will be able to understand Persian sentences much better.
 It is not necessary to say that if you master any of the romance languages, it will be much easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 But those who speak a little Spanish may come to the hurried conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and that it is unnecessary to study it individually.
 In the present day, most pre-modern observatories have become obsolete and remain as museums or educational destinations.
 In its heyday, light pollution was not a major problem as it is today, and they are often found in cities or on college campuses,
 Most of the current research telescopes consist of massive structures installed in remote areas with propitious atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, called Hanami, is a traditional practice in Japan since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China, where the Cherry blossom was the most appreciated.
 It was the Emperor of Japan who organized the first Cherry Blossom celebrations,
 Plants look better when they're in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to just take one.
 If you collect specimens during a visit to a Formalised garden, you will be expelled, without discussion.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to be in and very easy to get around in, and you can buy almost any product from the moment you arrive.
 But because of its location in the high, or near the equator, at a few degrees north of the equator, you will always have to deal with the heat and, when the sky is clear, with the strong sun, which happens less often.
 And some buses go to Hebron, to the North, which is the site where, according to the Bible, the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob and their wives were buried.
 He must verify that the bus he is about to board is going to Hebron and not just to Kyriat Arba, which is a Jewish neighborhood near Hebron.
 Inland waterways can be a good theme for a vacation.
 For example, visiting the castles of the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, taking a cruise to interesting destinations on the Danube, or cruising on the Erie Canal.
 They also delimit the routes for popular hiking and bicycling routes.
 For the Christian religion, Christmas is one of its most important festivities, in which the birth of Jesus Christ is celebrated.
 There are many traditions related to this festival that have been incorporated by people of both Christian and Non-Christian countries around the globe.
 It is a tradition to spend Easter Sunday at sea, watching the sunrise.
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations of this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 The more traditional churches usually offer a Paschal Vigil on the Saturday night during the Easter weekend and, generally, the congregations begin the celebrations for the resurrection of Christ just after midnight.
 All animals that originally came to the Islands,
 Because they are so far from the mainland, mammals were unable to reach them, and the giant tortoise became the main grazing creature on the Galápagos.
 Many mammalian species have been introduced to the Galapagos Islands since man arrived in the archipelago, such as, for example, the goat, the horse, the sheep, the pig, the rodents, the dogs, and the cats.
 If you travel to the Arctic or Antarctic regions in the winter, you will experience the polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 Since the sky will be dark for almost all day, it's a great opportunity to see the northern lights.
 Thanks to the sparse population that resides in these regions and the fact that, as a result, there are no problems with light pollution,
 In Japan, the work culture is much more vertical and formal than what people from the West are probably used to.
 The typical dress of the business world is suits and colleagues are addressed by their surnames or by their job titles.
 Harmony in the workplace is emphasized, where the efforts of the group are emphasized over the focus on individual achievements.
 Workers often have to get the approval of their superiors to make decisions and are expected to obey instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.24626142324560793, 'precisions': [0.5838352356484017, 0.31855175751176806, 0.19453013490492196, 0.11986284831216497], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9596457357381556, 'length_ratio': 0.960438493588447, 'translation_length': 23743, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 52.17374100162765, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8236835677574275, 'scores': [0.7792724370956421, 0.782471239566803, 0.9189649224281311, 0.41151177883148193, 0.757461428642273, 0.7996907830238342, 0.8478768467903137, 0.8512891530990601, 0.8527253270149231, 0.9006174802780151, 0.8669065833091736, 0.8286955952644348, 0.5396458506584167, 0.842357337474823, 0.897517740726471, 0.7876186966896057, 0.8617245554924011, 0.899152934551239, 0.8837218284606934, 0.8023598790168762, 0.8813237547874451, 0.8873620629310608, 0.810717761516571, 0.7249110341072083, 0.6830308437347412, 0.9131577610969543, 0.8380364775657654, 0.8498165607452393, 0.8441540002822876, 0.8390610218048096, 0.7056358456611633, 0.6975666880607605, 0.6133235096931458, 0.888278603553772, 0.9252037405967712, 0.8563910126686096, 0.8748587965965271, 0.8908372521400452, 0.7443392872810364, 0.8821989297866821, 0.8571115732192993, 0.9193060994148254, 0.8209671378135681, 0.8856920599937439, 0.8627602458000183, 0.7845925688743591, 0.8300063014030457, 0.9202994704246521, 0.8971206545829773, 0.4318518042564392, 0.9110103249549866, 0.8234367966651917, 0.912678062915802, 0.9195831418037415, 0.8569986820220947, 0.7957285046577454, 0.6966939568519592, 0.8373693227767944, 0.8329587578773499, 0.9268037676811218, 0.7374323606491089, 0.8901822566986084, 0.8109583258628845, 0.87852942943573, 0.89492267370224, 0.8389894366264343, 0.8169964551925659, 0.8420177102088928, 0.9092017412185669, 0.8723785281181335, 0.8759785890579224, 0.824910044670105, 0.8111622929573059, 0.8056960105895996, 0.8122338652610779, 0.8598604798316956, 0.8541329503059387, 0.8701238632202148, 0.9106544256210327, 0.9099960923194885, 0.6655674576759338, 0.7281935811042786, 0.871334969997406, 0.8352354764938354, 0.8572554588317871, 0.471384197473526, 0.7427108883857727, 0.8948911428451538, 0.87276691198349, 0.5917852520942688, 0.8425189852714539, 0.7018881440162659, 0.8822673559188843, 0.8847387433052063, 0.8954114317893982, 0.937906801700592, 0.8567339777946472, 0.8352820873260498, 0.8679181337356567, 0.8744333982467651, 0.8801398873329163, 0.880898654460907, 0.7686664462089539, 0.9007850885391235, 0.8042624592781067, 0.6216224431991577, 0.7764500379562378, 0.5234093070030212, 0.584376871585846, 0.8442969918251038, 0.9528406858444214, 0.930358350276947, 0.9261248707771301, 0.9275291562080383, 0.8281497359275818, 0.847642719745636, 0.8511231541633606, 0.8937870860099792, 0.8102786540985107, 0.7100492119789124, 0.5699564218521118, 0.648539125919342, 0.8953524231910706, 0.777302086353302, 0.8645034432411194, 0.5915042757987976, 0.8381741642951965, 0.9084215760231018, 0.8300638198852539, 0.8773654103279114, 0.8654103875160217, 0.847993791103363, 0.8750137686729431, 0.8644598126411438, 0.8231061100959778, 0.8103570342063904, 0.8679072260856628, 0.9055225849151611, 0.9354391694068909, 0.8101020455360413, 0.6900416612625122, 0.8187184929847717, 0.9410037398338318, 0.8822062611579895, 0.8778285980224609, 0.8521087169647217, 0.6839707493782043, 0.9144923090934753, 0.8787420988082886, 0.8595926761627197, 0.6130187511444092, 0.6708291172981262, 0.7520649433135986, 0.8296939134597778, 0.821634829044342, 0.8997782468795776, 0.8645716309547424, 0.7762921452522278, 0.8364912867546082, 0.8868798613548279, 0.8602445721626282, 0.6515892148017883, 0.8544118404388428, 0.6171906590461731, 0.9169419407844543, 0.733741819858551, 0.8739217519760132, 0.879497230052948, 0.8221472501754761, 0.8260616064071655, 0.8450843095779419, 0.34120428562164307, 0.9009408354759216, 0.8919399976730347, 0.8815510869026184, 0.8504099249839783, 0.8353366851806641, 0.855819046497345, 0.8530023694038391, 0.9354270696640015, 0.8486424684524536, 0.9445459842681885, 0.43115049600601196, 0.8901897072792053, 0.8406572341918945, 0.6405377984046936, 0.8617618680000305, 0.7133423686027527, 0.849004328250885, 0.6655460596084595, 0.8684380650520325, 0.5447503924369812, 0.8477647304534912, 0.7441982626914978, 0.8833838701248169, 0.7041985988616943, 0.4237435460090637, 0.7679217457771301, 0.8523128032684326, 0.8480971455574036, 0.8331921100616455, 0.7687459588050842, 0.7989633679389954, 0.7516831755638123, 0.8763702511787415, 0.8165115714073181, 0.8887496590614319, 0.821513831615448, 0.9023510813713074, 0.9288055896759033, 0.9276637434959412, 0.8968348503112793, 0.8868466019630432, 0.79839026927948, 0.9289723038673401, 0.9281579852104187, 0.893658459186554, 0.8760918974876404, 0.8729991912841797, 0.8646609783172607, 0.849714994430542, 0.8989455103874207, 0.9152578115463257, 0.9022361040115356, 0.9277014136314392, 0.8640449643135071, 0.8263769745826721, 0.6603984236717224, 0.8687325119972229, 0.868019163608551, 0.9054108262062073, 0.9076386094093323, 0.8283955454826355, 0.8767526745796204, 0.8270717263221741, 0.8869908452033997, 0.6809306740760803, 0.7828661799430847, 0.9234116077423096, 0.8678709864616394, 0.8117060661315918, 0.843468427658081, 0.7828115820884705, 0.7882792353630066, 0.8803339600563049, 0.8791974186897278, 0.7821201086044312, 0.5376096367835999, 0.8306908011436462, 0.9170375466346741, 0.896164059638977, 0.9265130758285522, 0.9110122919082642, 0.8743610978126526, 0.880692720413208, 0.866776704788208, 0.8919426798820496, 0.8935396075248718, 0.7237990498542786, 0.7465964555740356, 0.8651200532913208, 0.764249324798584, 0.8189242482185364, 0.8771466612815857, 0.8266659379005432, 0.7517803311347961, 0.7390242218971252, 0.8797183036804199, 0.8770226836204529, 0.7652302384376526, 0.8980193138122559, 0.7309742569923401, 0.8815680146217346, 0.8286452889442444, 0.7036740779876709, 0.7728000283241272, 0.7345635294914246, 0.9092170596122742, 0.5392957925796509, 0.802218496799469, 0.6942430138587952, 0.7444737553596497, 0.8956602215766907, 0.8051968216896057, 0.8911321759223938, 0.9290781617164612, 0.8745301961898804, 0.7684703469276428, 0.8917645812034607, 0.508175253868103, 0.796334445476532, 0.8305604457855225, 0.8763449192047119, 0.9032633304595947, 0.8274387121200562, 0.6228312253952026, 0.5939105153083801, 0.8684729933738708, 0.814308226108551, 0.8684225082397461, 0.8797909617424011, 0.8743094801902771, 0.7833638787269592, 0.5683739185333252, 0.8649678826332092, 0.7970922589302063, 0.737521231174469, 0.8339797854423523, 0.8970209956169128, 0.8864899277687073, 0.889890730381012, 0.939786434173584, 0.8858487010002136, 0.7463886141777039, 0.9384180307388306, 0.8320246338844299, 0.8613641262054443, 0.8868831992149353, 0.8974698781967163, 0.8730430006980896, 0.5515550374984741, 0.5522843599319458, 0.4555881917476654, 0.8713561296463013, 0.8819858431816101, 0.7307100892066956, 0.8570254445075989, 0.847305953502655, 0.6716111302375793, 0.8092926740646362, 0.9040924906730652, 0.8086946606636047, 0.8688415884971619, 0.7845094799995422, 0.9291669726371765, 0.8537392020225525, 0.900063693523407, 0.8004236817359924, 0.8076605200767517, 0.8842924237251282, 0.33862757682800293, 0.7109535932540894, 0.8354628086090088, 0.8636124730110168, 0.9143211245536804, 0.8584999442100525, 0.8714601397514343, 0.7949355840682983, 0.6889206767082214, 0.7738774418830872, 0.8743754029273987, 0.8235398530960083, 0.8486494421958923, 0.9096069931983948, 0.9206719994544983, 0.714492917060852, 0.8783713579177856, 0.8516567349433899, 0.8344979286193848, 0.8230736255645752, 0.5514129996299744, 0.5848042368888855, 0.8951656222343445, 0.8286358714103699, 0.9164953827857971, 0.3463982343673706, 0.7877489924430847, 0.846078097820282, 0.8208367228507996, 0.7868898510932922, 0.814952552318573, 0.6213874220848083, 0.4165287911891937, 0.9001652598381042, 0.9053143262863159, 0.8750972151756287, 0.9027068614959717, 0.91069096326828, 0.8480132818222046, 0.8377684354782104, 0.8747149109840393, 0.9159269332885742, 0.8171051144599915, 0.7323828339576721, 0.8308852314949036, 0.8612312078475952, 0.7465291619300842, 0.8564502596855164, 0.7308679819107056, 0.920206606388092, 0.879262387752533, 0.9006577134132385, 0.825113832950592, 0.9253801703453064, 0.9102646112442017, 0.8063533902168274, 0.7024593353271484, 0.9506706595420837, 0.6626693606376648, 0.8895748853683472, 0.6977320313453674, 0.8815096020698547, 0.8114338517189026, 0.7117622494697571, 0.7618747353553772, 0.9125073552131653, 0.8272916674613953, 0.8522922396659851, 0.40853413939476013, 0.9153863787651062, 0.8664204478263855, 0.7450682520866394, 0.8178110718727112, 0.8891538977622986, 0.8176376819610596, 0.6981984972953796, 0.8340725302696228, 0.8439825177192688, 0.9087772965431213, 0.8634763360023499, 0.8856497406959534, 0.8705328106880188, 0.8803860545158386, 0.7967159748077393, 0.5409912467002869, 0.8904327750205994, 0.6064674258232117, 0.8812594413757324, 0.8696120977401733, 0.9465353488922119, 0.8902155160903931, 0.7843798995018005, 0.8762924075126648, 0.5932876467704773, 0.5513119101524353, 0.8158084154129028, 0.8521613478660583, 0.9135979413986206, 0.8813586831092834, 0.8812698721885681, 0.901218831539154, 0.8538464307785034, 0.9446350932121277, 0.7200438976287842, 0.8334135413169861, 0.8044019937515259, 0.8655813932418823, 0.914868175983429, 0.9157894849777222, 0.727572500705719, 0.8948764204978943, 0.7172990441322327, 0.9205579161643982, 0.8707877993583679, 0.7635113596916199, 0.8543950915336609, 0.6988748908042908, 0.8895412087440491, 0.7842101454734802, 0.8632687926292419, 0.8585790991783142, 0.745185911655426, 0.6730669140815735, 0.8262202143669128, 0.8588322997093201, 0.37962785363197327, 0.874301016330719, 0.7172091603279114, 0.7237692475318909, 0.7175712585449219, 0.8504422903060913, 0.43227705359458923, 0.871117353439331, 0.8093637228012085, 0.8043857216835022, 0.8206617832183838, 0.8159804940223694, 0.8892439603805542, 0.9008790850639343, 0.8786390423774719, 0.6442252993583679, 0.8156220316886902, 0.8218015432357788, 0.8240010142326355, 0.8942746520042419, 0.879173219203949, 0.8718807697296143, 0.8277073502540588, 0.8492857813835144, 0.8694072365760803, 0.8700762391090393, 0.8350325226783752, 0.86118084192276, 0.9088313579559326, 0.7789452075958252, 0.8784118890762329, 0.799466609954834, 0.8734387159347534, 0.9121242761611938, 0.8529525399208069, 0.8516303896903992, 0.9326852560043335, 0.8786544799804688, 0.7957846522331238, 0.650741696357727, 0.8808619976043701, 0.8436424136161804, 0.7570313811302185, 0.8378257155418396, 0.8053349256515503, 0.7560959458351135, 0.8056814670562744, 0.7804588675498962, 0.8340979218482971, 0.8788772225379944, 0.9277216196060181, 0.8242093920707703, 0.8813899755477905, 0.8646389842033386, 0.8467068076133728, 0.6246112585067749, 0.7618744969367981, 0.8710888624191284, 0.8606194257736206, 0.8679748177528381, 0.8396918773651123, 0.8505539894104004, 0.7740426659584045, 0.6663017272949219, 0.8463770151138306, 0.8458091020584106, 0.8637931942939758, 0.8199692964553833, 0.8517225980758667, 0.8070746064186096, 0.5197879672050476, 0.6973002552986145, 0.8712250590324402, 0.454304963350296, 0.8934960961341858, 0.8580226302146912, 0.7985780835151672, 0.8594363927841187, 0.6933717131614685, 0.7761803865432739, 0.9172747731208801, 0.8745335936546326, 0.6385075449943542, 0.7040112614631653, 0.8977720737457275, 0.8320944905281067, 0.7849176526069641, 0.6089412569999695, 0.8735876679420471, 0.9247059226036072, 0.7959961295127869, 0.7940312027931213, 0.8494574427604675, 0.8067361116409302, 0.8082407116889954, 0.8927317261695862, 0.9050033688545227, 0.5457261800765991, 0.8806970715522766, 0.8830915093421936, 0.9041721224784851, 0.6565673351287842, 0.9063902497291565, 0.8147308230400085, 0.7647014260292053, 0.740010678768158, 0.8613117337226868, 0.7367086410522461, 0.7453061938285828, 0.8430361151695251, 0.861060380935669, 0.879852831363678, 0.8331543803215027, 0.888384997844696, 0.8732420802116394, 0.8616190552711487, 0.896474301815033, 0.8382294774055481, 0.8657941818237305, 0.8215932250022888, 0.5388101935386658, 0.7634703516960144, 0.9044939875602722, 0.8071666955947876, 0.9195064902305603, 0.9057785868644714, 0.8147631883621216, 0.8218516707420349, 0.8657568693161011, 0.8484519720077515, 0.8742691278457642, 0.8897770047187805, 0.8950691819190979, 0.824597179889679, 0.878767192363739, 0.8349781632423401, 0.8413011431694031, 0.839904248714447, 0.914289653301239, 0.8764201998710632, 0.9265938997268677, 0.8151558637619019, 0.757110059261322, 0.7370310425758362, 0.855993926525116, 0.883429229259491, 0.8993257880210876, 0.6251763701438904, 0.8840873837471008, 0.8122599720954895, 0.8749291896820068, 0.8699153065681458, 0.699504554271698, 0.8794325590133667, 0.8623969554901123, 0.9595372080802917, 0.6450740694999695, 0.8923758864402771, 0.7851442694664001, 0.7715372443199158, 0.8857192397117615, 0.9034705758094788, 0.920376718044281, 0.8875385522842407, 0.8757475018501282, 0.8632887005805969, 0.8829205632209778, 0.8612135052680969, 0.8714943528175354, 0.5386897921562195, 0.7136386036872864, 0.9062003493309021, 0.824907124042511, 0.8902598023414612, 0.8743842840194702, 0.8512031435966492, 0.9242395758628845, 0.8190370202064514, 0.7989440560340881, 0.8505070209503174, 0.7919763326644897, 0.8335331678390503, 0.8853093385696411, 0.6444258093833923, 0.8846482634544373, 0.9212456941604614, 0.9446382522583008, 0.8573182225227356, 0.837102472782135, 0.8644365072250366, 0.9130542874336243, 0.8957690596580505, 0.8172991871833801, 0.7418094277381897, 0.7627016305923462, 0.8393732905387878, 0.9193328022956848, 0.8597727417945862, 0.8808793425559998, 0.917401134967804, 0.807951033115387, 0.6008335947990417, 0.8263224959373474, 0.7844848036766052, 0.9040752053260803, 0.8710933923721313, 0.92828369140625, 0.8999360799789429, 0.8130946159362793, 0.891434371471405, 0.9052465558052063, 0.8406171202659607, 0.8987066745758057, 0.8742761611938477, 0.9200102686882019, 0.8776260018348694, 0.9382842183113098, 0.8605572581291199, 0.8647040724754333, 0.8575789928436279, 0.9236469864845276, 0.889699399471283, 0.8126431107521057, 0.8491905927658081, 0.729431688785553, 0.9033244848251343, 0.736005961894989, 0.8784132599830627, 0.791785717010498, 0.8729400038719177, 0.9220404624938965, 0.5615923404693604, 0.897042453289032, 0.8667997121810913, 0.9034796357154846, 0.8214027285575867, 0.8189589381217957, 0.891496479511261, 0.8312775492668152, 0.6038283705711365, 0.8919658064842224, 0.6975629925727844, 0.8624023199081421, 0.908620297908783, 0.8977651000022888, 0.9017718434333801, 0.8107088804244995, 0.9104875922203064, 0.8181288838386536, 0.8050541281700134, 0.8177803754806519, 0.7073032259941101, 0.7721602320671082, 0.8796257972717285, 0.941521942615509, 0.8831748366355896, 0.883449375629425, 0.869042694568634, 0.9172729849815369, 0.8735184669494629, 0.9064744710922241, 0.895082414150238, 0.8311536908149719, 0.7447591423988342, 0.8633180856704712, 0.7737846970558167, 0.8480793237686157, 0.809731662273407, 0.8985238671302795, 0.8302914500236511, 0.883048951625824, 0.9147708415985107, 0.8523170948028564, 0.8915112614631653, 0.8707379698753357, 0.8193149566650391, 0.8215721249580383, 0.8734866976737976, 0.8007192015647888, 0.8789655566215515, 0.8413804173469543, 0.8914769291877747, 0.8800519108772278, 0.8753633499145508, 0.8914202451705933, 0.9513906836509705, 0.9252756834030151, 0.8474161624908447, 0.8568601608276367, 0.6967661380767822, 0.8421950340270996, 0.7729635834693909, 0.8054111003875732, 0.8178960084915161, 0.8628246188163757, 0.9270493388175964, 0.9227283000946045, 0.9238267540931702, 0.8430207967758179, 0.8780561089515686, 0.8858731389045715, 0.7264416217803955, 0.8516743779182434, 0.9103559851646423, 0.9593293070793152, 0.8944553732872009, 0.8294612765312195, 0.8717706799507141, 0.8442535996437073, 0.8885908126831055, 0.8874245285987854, 0.6448710560798645, 0.7558769583702087, 0.7681456208229065, 0.7813348174095154, 0.8929463028907776, 0.6090859770774841, 0.9259329438209534, 0.8705211877822876, 0.8910768032073975, 0.6490616798400879, 0.8986032605171204, 0.6756634712219238, 0.8720734715461731, 0.8937699198722839, 0.9218917489051819, 0.7845446467399597, 0.8952208161354065, 0.8896782398223877, 0.8726106882095337, 0.7790049314498901, 0.966712474822998, 0.7902701497077942, 0.7835728526115417, 0.7294961810112, 0.8386539220809937, 0.8185336589813232, 0.902604877948761, 0.8712931275367737, 0.7618652582168579, 0.8702215552330017, 0.8978174924850464, 0.9166108965873718, 0.9110059142112732, 0.8743190169334412, 0.8596082329750061, 0.659949004650116, 0.6232630014419556, 0.89412921667099, 0.8557558655738831, 0.6505354642868042, 0.7893619537353516, 0.8159460425376892, 0.6682787537574768, 0.8627391457557678, 0.9338220357894897, 0.8407138586044312, 0.8564713597297668, 0.7477710247039795, 0.9049361944198608, 0.6370645761489868, 0.6701285243034363, 0.8819130063056946, 0.871542751789093, 0.9017252326011658, 0.7545142769813538, 0.8750270009040833, 0.8521840572357178, 0.7979036569595337, 0.750769853591919, 0.8637897372245789, 0.8843207955360413, 0.7772709131240845, 0.68012934923172, 0.9042899012565613, 0.813421368598938, 0.8208902478218079, 0.5168600082397461, 0.8546907901763916, 0.7193475365638733, 0.8357624411582947, 0.6707274317741394, 0.8589478731155396, 0.8026404976844788, 0.8644766211509705, 0.8755030035972595, 0.8989750742912292, 0.8116142153739929, 0.7456402778625488, 0.6571272611618042, 0.7844840288162231, 0.7959596514701843, 0.9164301156997681, 0.8750477433204651, 0.8437697291374207, 0.8626114130020142, 0.7913914322853088, 0.9131317734718323, 0.8664999604225159, 0.8196518421173096, 0.8399824500083923, 0.7999401688575745, 0.781257688999176, 0.8690304756164551, 0.800381600856781, 0.8978545069694519, 0.867516815662384, 0.7580422759056091, 0.8440049290657043, 0.8761031031608582, 0.8502987623214722, 0.8566140532493591, 0.8773396611213684, 0.9604339003562927, 0.7126009464263916, 0.8937707543373108, 0.906765878200531, 0.9255627989768982, 0.869330108165741, 0.7744609713554382, 0.9054228067398071, 0.8825135231018066, 0.8449807167053223, 0.8175570368766785, 0.843153178691864, 0.8919811844825745, 0.8731876611709595, 0.6604477763175964, 0.5318583846092224, 0.8937827944755554, 0.8491457104682922, 0.9121629595756531, 0.8434234857559204, 0.9282838106155396, 0.9007361531257629, 0.6959545016288757, 0.8852444887161255, 0.8513273596763611, 0.8341435790061951, 0.8780248761177063, 0.8653131127357483, 0.8188461661338806, 0.8418397307395935, 0.8218571543693542, 0.9146416783332825, 0.8719884753227234, 0.8377725481987, 0.9011294841766357, 0.8974214196205139, 0.904310405254364, 0.884494960308075, 0.8831549286842346, 0.8081578612327576, 0.8314824104309082, 0.9135457873344421, 0.9396218657493591, 0.7070584893226624, 0.8754593729972839, 0.710199773311615, 0.8332930207252502, 0.546532154083252, 0.8530489206314087, 0.7394052147865295, 0.8953225612640381, 0.562261164188385, 0.901835024356842, 0.8784189224243164, 0.8018335103988647, 0.7556822896003723, 0.7905067801475525, 0.7932775616645813, 0.8522868752479553, 0.933986246585846, 0.8345946669578552, 0.7659929990768433, 0.9121530055999756, 0.9482494592666626, 0.9107304215431213, 0.7755935788154602, 0.7132014036178589, 0.8106276392936707, 0.8799164891242981, 0.8663854598999023, 0.8502921462059021, 0.9000003933906555, 0.7987558245658875, 0.8483487963676453, 0.7972516417503357, 0.7881930470466614, 0.8678162693977356, 0.8318039774894714, 0.679388701915741, 0.8265307545661926, 0.8478798270225525, 0.9310188889503479, 0.7327908277511597, 0.799978494644165, 0.8910073637962341, 0.8939530253410339, 0.9532248973846436, 0.7811874747276306, 0.8655002117156982, 0.8142375349998474, 0.9106246829032898, 0.7289572954177856, 0.8993404507637024, 0.632586658000946, 0.7838656306266785, 0.9016751646995544, 0.5580666661262512, 0.8724693655967712, 0.8170467019081116, 0.6940016150474548, 0.9314869046211243, 0.8453994393348694, 0.776294469833374, 0.8627142906188965, 0.9087572693824768, 0.7803168296813965, 0.8998775482177734, 0.8471248745918274, 0.8530588150024414, 0.6384865045547485, 0.737821102142334, 0.7866844534873962, 0.9029210209846497, 0.792131245136261, 0.8602295517921448, 0.8193821310997009, 0.9134913086891174, 0.8830035328865051, 0.9016589522361755, 0.9001504182815552, 0.798262357711792, 0.7537659406661987, 0.9290819764137268, 0.8508778214454651, 0.6042311787605286, 0.8065574169158936, 0.8363686203956604, 0.9220749139785767, 0.7825092077255249, 0.7584149837493896, 0.8941344618797302, 0.8426116108894348, 0.8695170283317566, 0.888176441192627]}